Introduction: Avoidance of extracorporeal circulation during beating heart surgery (OP CAB = Off-Pump Coronary Artery Bypass Surgery) for aortocoronary bypass grafting (ACBG) is gaining increasing importance in modern cardiac surgery.
With the development of new mechanical stabilization devices, the revascularization of the posterior wall of the heart and the distal rith coronary artery became feasable.
Especially high-risk patients with multiple risk factors for open heart surgery will profit from this approach, because the negative effects of the extracorporeal circulation are avoided.
Although dementia is described as one of the constituent characteristics of normal pressure hydrocephalus (NPH), alongside gait disturbances and urinary incontinence, there is a rather limited number of controlled studies concerning neuropsychological deficits in the disease.
A wide range of psychopathologically relevant symptoms have been described, but the common features of most cases include mental and motor slowing, apathy, emotional indifference, anosognosia, memory and attentional impairment.
A number of other functional deficits such as dyslexia, dysgraphia, acalculia, apraxia can also frequently be found.
Some emphasis is put on the work of J. de Mol (Brussels) which appears to be most important for the study of neuropsychological symptoms in NPH patients.
The methodological standard of a number of studies has been found to be rather low, and yet a sound neuropsychological investigation may be of utmost importance for the diagnosis and neurosurgical outcome assessment.
Concerning morphological correlates of the functional deficits in NPH, various hypotheses have been formulated, but it is argued that symptoms can neither be described as predominantly "diffuse" in nature, nor can they be reduced to unilocular dysfunctions.
Recommendations for future research strategies are formulated.
Up to now there are no published results of therapy of paraphilia (Pedophilia, Sadism) and sexual aggressive impulsiveness with LHRH-(luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone) Agonists in the Germanspeaking countries.
In this report we describe 11 patients which were treated with the LHRH-Agonist Leuprolide Acetate in a period of 12 months.
The patients showed no tendency of sexuell aggressive behaviour and reported an evident reduction of penile erection, ejaculation, masturbation, sexual deviant impulsiveness and phantasies.
One patient died from suicide.
In combination with other treatments LHRH-Agonist seem to be a very promising alternative to cyproterone acetate and its possible carcinogene effects.
Aim of the study: To investigate the long-term effect of TNFR55-IgG1 in patients with severe rheumatoid arthritis refractory to multiple previous DMARD treatments.
Methods: Between 1994 and 1995 we recruited 80 patients for two double blind, placebo-controlled multicenter trials.
All patients were treated for 2-30 months with a glycosylated fused protein consisting of two human p55 TNF receptors linked to a human IgG1-Fc.
The dose range was 2.5-100mg/month given i.v.
with cumulative doses from 40-940mg.
All patients were followed-up prospectively for 24-36 months after initiation of therapy.
The evaluations included a 48 swollen and tender joint count, ESR, CRP, RF, ANA, ENA, and safety parameters at 6 month intervals.
In addition, pharmacokinetics, TNF, and anti-TNFR55-IgG1 antibody levels were available after the first and third injection.
Results: Data from 80 patients are available representing an experience of more than 170 patient years;  11 patients are still being treated.
Predominant reasons for treatment withdrawal were restrictions in treatment protocol.
Six patients died  (1 during treatment, 5 in the post-treatment follow-up).
All deaths were related to preexisting cardiovascular disease except one post-surgery septic arthritis 6 months after the last dosing (during vacation in another country).
Anti-TNFR55-IgG1 antibodies correlated with a decrease in drug half-time.
Shifts in the TNFR55-IgG1 glycosylation pattern affected pharmacokinetics and efficacy.
A lupus nephritis occurred 18 months after the last dosing in one patient with erosive RA (ANA and dsDNS positive already before TNFR55-IgG1 initiation).
Continued treatment for 3 years in 11 patients resulted in an 81% reduction in swollen joint count, less morning stiffness, less pain, and a reduction in steroids.
Conclusion: Treatment with TNFR55-IgG1 is safe and efficacious over the long-term in patients with severe refractory RA.
For both VFR and as IFR flight, visual assessment is the major source of information for the pilot.
The new possibilities for change of refraction by means of corneal refractive surgery have led to an increasing demand from pilots for these new methods.
Can these methods successfully be applied for aviation purposes?
The valid regulations for medical standards of pilots, as well as the future international regulations such as JAR and ICAO, are explained in this respect.
A report is given on the work of the Advisory Board of the German Federal Government Air Traffic Authority and on the cases treated so far and their outcome, and recommendations are expressed.
Concerning the legal situation and clinical experience, advice for pilots, aviation medical examiners and ophthalmologists is given.
Persistent remnants of the caudal müllerian ducts can manifest in several forms and are often associated with other urogenital disorders, especially hypospadias.
Inadequate activity of the müllerian inhibiting factor, in addition to fetal testosterone deficiency, is responsible for this syndrome.
The etiology, diagnosis and management of müllerian duct remnants are discussed.
A complex case of penile-scrotal hypospadia, hypoplastic prostate gland, testicular ectopia and retrovesical cyst is presented.
The official German guidelines for prevention of nosocomial pneumonia were published by the Bundesgesundheitsamt, now called Robert-Koch-Institut, twelve years ago.
The recently published official "guidelines for prevention of nosocomial pneumonia" of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) are categorized according to scientific evidence.
The American guidelines are very detailed and differ in some aspects from the official German guidelines.
The purpose of the present paper is to inform the German anaesthesiologist about the official CDC guidelines and to provide a renewed background for the prevention of nosocomial pneumonia.
At present, the importation into Germany of life-threatening and highly contagious diseases such as pneumonic plague and Ebola is unlikely, but cannot be ruled out.
In spite of the extreme rarity of these diseases, guidelines are necessary to prevent the spread of these agents in case of their importation.
In Germany, marked regional differences exist with respect to the development of emergency regulations and the availability of specialized centers for diagnostics and therapy.
A federal framework is missing.
A concept is presented here in which the capacity to respond is substantially augmented with limited additional cost through inter-regional cooperation using existing infrastructure and federally standardized procedures.
The therapeutic effect and the side effects of fumaric acid derivatives used in treatment of psoriasis vulgaris have been subjects of controversy for more than 30 years.
A total of 83 patients with severe psoriasis vulgaris were investigated in as ingle-centre, long-term open (12 months) clinical trial to evaluate the efficacy and safety profile of the fumaric acid ester preparations Fumaderm initial and Fumaderm.
The antipsoriatic effect of the fumaric acid derivatives was clear, with a mean reduction of 76% in PASI.
Adverse events in were noted in 62% of the patients (mainly flushing and gastrointestinal complaints).
These were dose-dependent and decreased in frequency in the course of the study.
No severe adverse events occurred.
We believe that of fumaric acid derivatives are indicated in cases of severe therapy-resistant psoriasis to and can be used even for long-term application.
Background: Because retinal necrosis syndrome seldom occurs, we present our results of silicone oil tamponade for associated retinal detachment.
The eyelids are the site of many different pathological conditions.
Swelling - often oedematous - is a frequent symptom.
This publication deals with the pathophysiological and anatomical basis of eyelid swelling and mainly provides a practical approach for differential diagnosis with the help of flow and short characterisations of possible causes.
The subjective complaints of the patient charts (pain, pruritus) are shown to be important criteria for orientation.
Special interest is focussed on allergic diseases and atrophic conditions as causes of eyelid swelling.
A 74-year-old man suffered from symptoms of a left upper lobe pneumonia.
Additional retrosternal masses were proved.
Progression in the left upper lobe occurred in spite of antibiotic therapy; infiltrations of the right lower lobe were seen.
No germs could be identified.
Bronchoscopy and mediastinoscopy showed no pathological findings.
His general health became worse, and the patient died under the clinical diagnosis of "wandering pneumonia" with finally suspicion of fulminant pulmonary artery embolism.
Autopsy findings revealed an advanced stage of pulmonary artery sarcoma with myocardial infiltration and metastases in both kidneys and thyroid gland.
General manifestation of pulmonary artery sarcoma usually are symptoms similar to those caused by pulmonary artery embolism with obstruction of pulmonary arterial flow.
The unusual constellation of clinical findings similar to colliquating pneumonia results in secondary infection due to tumorous pulmonary infarction.
The difficulties in diagnosis by biopsy are caused by primary intravascular growth of the neoplasms.
Therefore early diagnosis in an operable tumor stage by means of CT, MR, and angiography is very important.
Definition of the problem: Is it the brain that makes a human being a person?
This anthropological question has been raised because of the findings of modern human brain research, and there are severe ethical consequences anew: If the appropriate anthropological answer is yes, then all invasive research would be problematic, because one would touch the basis of human essence.
The problem is that the two major philosophical paradigms that offer an answer to the anthropological question, dualism and monism, have opposing concepts.
Arguments: This paper argues that the error of these two paradigms is that they understand the human body and the human mind as 'res' - as things.
The explanation of the human being as an interactive unit of body and mind is impossible in both paradigms.
A third anthropological view that tries to make that understandable is the anthropology of the Hebrew Bible.
It does assume the category 'thing' while speaking about humans, it presumes the category 'aspect'.
There is no Hebrew word for 'mind' in contrast to 'body' or vice versa.
The biblical language only knows terms for the unity of human beings seen under a certain aspect.
Conclusion: Here, the body and thus the brain are important and necessary condition for human essence, but this is not a sufficient explanation for the human personality.
Invasive research on the human brain is here neither generally forbidden nor tolerated - one has to demonstrate in every single case whether the planned operation touches regions that are crucial for the personality of the human subject.
Introduction: In recent studies we identified two morphological phenomena in the facial nucleus of the brainstem that play an important role in the recovery of facial movement: hyperinnervation and misdirected reinnervation.
While the hyperinnervation could easily be quantified by cell counting, the extent of misdirected reinnervation could not be estimated accurately.
In the present study we developed a method for accurate quantification of this misdirected reinnervation.
A 50 year old female patient received anaesthesia of the arm by the vertical infraclavicular blockade of the plexus brachialis (VIP).
Postoperatively an ipsilateral pneumothorax occured complicated by pleural effusion and a contralateral bronchopneumonia, which resolved completely after treatment.
The blockade of the plexus was performed correctly, failures in determining the correct point of needle insertion could be excluded.
Therefore a pneumothorax has to be regarded as a specific complication of the VIP, which might occur despite correct technique, and requires that the patient be informed of this eventuality.
Nevertheless, the VIP is an important method due to its high success rate concerning blockade of the musculocutaneous nerve and tolerance of tourniquet.
The risk of a pneumothorax is about 0.2 to 0.7%.
The routine application of ultrasound in pregnancy has had an important impact on perinatal medicine.
New trends in perinatal medicine, aiming at more individual and self-determined pregnancy and delivery, are realizable because of the safety provided by ultrasound.
Often prenatal ultrasound is regarded as only being able to detect fetal malformations, but ultrasound provides many more benefits for a safe pregnancy: early detection of fetal viability; intrauterine localization of the pregnancy; exact determination of the gestational age in early pregnancy; later in pregnancy, confirmation of appropriate fetal growth, position and localization of placenta site.
In addition, the development of close mother-child bonding by visualizing the fetus could be of positive impact.
These aspects are contributions of ultrasound to a gentle and safe pregnancy and delivery for mother and child.
For routine evaluation of ureteropelvic junction obstruction in children, sonography, voiding cystogram, IV pyelogram and a renal scan in combination with administration of furosemide are available.
Furthermore, often preoperative antegrade or retrograde ureteropyelography is performed.
However, the significance of retrograde ureteropyelography in the world literature remains controversial.
Therefore, we reviewed the records of 41 children who underwent a pyeloplasty in our department.
In 9 children the ureter was visualized by IV pyelogram, voiding cystogram or antegrade ureteropyelography; a retrograde examination of the ureter was performed in 21 children before pyeloplasty in the OR.
In 11 children the ureter was not visualized preoperatively.
Retrograde ureterography neither gave additional information in any patient nor did it change the operative technique.
In the children where the ureter was not visualized preoperatively, no ureteric abnormality was found in association with ureteropelvic junction obstruction.
Hence, we conclude that retrograde ureteropyelography before pyeloplasty in children is not necessary, provided that sonography does not show ureteral dilatation.
We report on a patient with multicentric juvenile xanthogranuloma, whose unusual clinical and histological pattern initially obscured the diagnosis.
Spontaneous remission of the tumour, which has now been maintained for over 2 years, the change from the primary monomorphological fibrocytic appearance to a polymorphological histiocytic picture with multiple fat-storing giant cells, and the lacking demonstration of specific cell organelles finally allowed the nature of the disease to the definitely diagnosed.
In children with horseshoe kidneys Wilms' tumors can be observed 2 to 8-times more often.
Wilms' tumors are malignant mixed tissue tumors that seldom show large parts of fatty tissue.
We report about a 28-month-old girl with an unusual Wilms' tumor in a horseshoe kidney which according to radiological criteria could have been a teratoma because of its large lipomatous part with internal calcifications.
The radiological characteristics of these differential diagnoses are presented in different cross-section imagings.
Both differential diagnostic considerations correlated with the histologic diagnosis of a teratoid Wilms'tumor.
Gene therapy in orthopedic surgery is a new technic based on the idea of biological tissue healing.
External gene segments are transferred to cells that overexpress growth factors locally to achieve this effect.
The influence of growth factors on fracture healing is very well documented in the literature.
Experimental data demonstrate that defect healing in bone can be accelerated by the application of different cytokines in vivo.
Gene transfer is a promising, new technic of in situ tissue engineering that will enter clinics within the next decade.
Biomechanical investigations of the mandible are difficult to perform due to a variety of conditions involved.
For the appropriate reconstruction of biomechanical properties, a geometrically correct body model has to be established which fits to complex in vivo conditions.
The aim of our study was to evaluate the use of finite-element models (FEM) for the assessment of mandibular deformation under mechanical loading.
Explanted human mandibles (n = 5) were investigated by strain gauges to determine the individual strain distribution under mechanical loading.
FEM analysis based on a computed tomograph (CT) was performed and the results were matched with the test data.
Our study demonstrates only minor interindividual differences in the strain distribution for each load studied.
The mechanical response in terms of deformation was found to depend mainly on gross geometrical properties and to a minor extent on the various other variables.
At all positions the maximum principal strain was tensile, the minimum principal strain was compressive, and the absolute strain values were correlated with the magnitude of the applied force.
CT-based FEM analysis revealed the utility of mathematical models to approximate simulated data our experimental results.
Hence, FEM analysis is a non-invasive tool in the prediction of biomechanical behaviour of individual mandibles and therefore may help in trauma reconstruction and treatment planning.
Acrodysostosis is a rare syndrome characterized by growth retardation and peripheral dysostosis.
70% of affected patients exhibit mental retardation.
Inheritance occurs in an autosomal-dominant pattern.
The genetic defect is not known.
Therapeutic strategies in the treatment of pancreatic carcinoma are based on the high number of non-resectable cancers, the high relative radioresistance and the high distant metastases rate.
Even in curatively resected carcinomas, a locally effective treatment modality is needed because of the risk of microscopical residual disease in the peripancreatic tissue.
The efficacy of radiotherapy is dose dependent.
Based on an analysis of published data a dose of more than 50 Gy is recommended, resulting in a high morbidity rate with external beam radiotherapy alone.
The use of intraoperative radiotherapy allows locally restricted dose escalation without increased perioperative morbidity.
In adjuvant and in primary treatment, local tumor contol was improved (70-90 %).
With palliative intent, pain relief was obtained rapidly in over 60 % of patients and led to improved patient performance.
As a result of the high distant metastases rate, even in curatively resected carcinomas, the overall prognosis could not be significantly improved.
Further dose escalation is limited by the increasing incidence of upper gastrointestinal bleeding (20-30 %).
Malignant tumors of the head and neck region are amongst the six most often occurring tumors of the body.
They can be associated with the different anatomical compartments as well as different histologic types.
The way of tumor spread of these malignancies depends on their histologic type and on the region.
These compartments can be separated into the nasopharynx, the oropharynx, and the hypopharynx.
Most of the malignant tumors belong to the squamous cell carcinomas, other histologic types are depicted less frequently.
The histologic types of the other groups which are seen more often comprise of lymphomas and adenoidcystic carcinomas.
The undifferentiated carcinoma of the nasopharynx is supposed to be a special type of tumor.
The malignant tumors of the pharynx can also involve all three compartments.
Beside these tumors, malignancies of mesenchymal origin can also be delineated.
While there are quite a number of reports on vascular injuries complicating hip arthropasty by acetabular component screw fixation, retractor tip pressure or extruding bone cement, the incidence of deep femoral vessel injuries in operative fixation of proximal femoral fractures is comparatively seldom described.
We report on two patients with per- and subtrochanteric femoral fractures who sustained injuries of deep femoral artery branches during the implantation of a dynamic hip screw (DHS) and a dynamic condylar screw (DCS), which resulted in a massive thigh hematoma and a fist-size pseudoaneurysm respectively and necessitated surgical intervention in either case.
We blame these vascular injuries on the pressure of Hohmann retractors exposing the femoral bone or on the drilling of boreholes for plate attachement.
After discussing various operative procedures, we conclude that intramedullar implants are safer than plates with regard to potential vascular complications.
Cleft lip and palates (CLP) are caused by a variety of factors.
Ionizing radiation is only one of these factors.
The meltdown of the nuclear reactor at Chernobyl on April 26, 1986, and the subsequent radioactive fallout did not cause any acute radiation sickness in Germany.
Nevertheless, in West Berlin a significant increase of trisomy-21 cases was reported in births 9 months after the Chernobyl reactor accident.
In our study we analyzed the influence of the radioactive fallout after the Chernobyl disaster on the rate and regional distribution of CLP newborns in the former German Democratic Republic (GDR).
In contrast to the Federal Republic of Germany an ongoing malformation register for CLP newborns had existed in the former GDR since 4 July 1967.
Environmental data were collected from national and international environmental authorities and atomic energy agencies.
Population statistics were taken from the statistical yearbook of the former GDR.
During a 10-year period from 1980 to 1989, the average number of CLP newborns in the GDR was 1.88 per 1,000 live births.
A significant prevalence increase was recorded in 1983, 1987 und 1988.
In comparison to the mean rate in the period from 1980 until 1986, 1987 demonstrated an increase of 9.4%.
Regional prevalence increases were seen in the three northern districts of Schwerin, Rostock and Neubrandenburg, where the radioactivity measurements in general showed higher levels of the radionuclides caesium-137 und strontium-90 than in other districts.
Owing to the comprehensive malformation register for CLP patients in the GDR, this is the first study for Germany, analyzing the CLP rate before and after the fallout in Chernobyl.
The results support the allegation of the influence of radiation-induced increase of CLP newborns after the Chernobyl reactor accident.
The median survival time for patients with disseminated malignant melanoma is 5-7 months; it is still not really known whether therapeutic measures prolong survival.
The aim of the present investigation was to identify patients with prolonged survival in stage IV disease and to analyse the possible impact of therapy on the course of the disease.
in the Department of Dermatology, Benjamin Franklin University Medical Centre at the Free University of Berlin, 263 patients with were diagnosed as having stage IV melanoma and enrolled in a computer-based registry between 1970 and 1993.
In 89 cases systemic medical mentous treatment was given and 111 patients underwent surgery and/or radiation therapy.
There were 48 patients who received both systemic and local therapy.
On the other hand, 111 patients received no treatment.
Twenty two patients were identified survived longer than 24 months (median survival time 33 months).
None of the patients who had received no treatment survived for 2 years or longer.
The 22 patients with prolonged survival were treated by multimodality included 16 who had received both systemic treatment and surgery and/or radiation, while 3 had had only systemic drug therapy and another 3, only local treatment.
Twelve of the 22 patients became tumour free after their initial surgery or radiation.
Active therapy in disseminated melanoma with reduction of tumour mass by surgery and radiation and with systemic medical treatment may lead to prolonged survival in a considerable percentage of patients.
Background: The use of intravenous heparin is essential for the treatment of unstable angina and acute myocardial infarction.
A significant rebound of thrombin generation within 6 to 10 hours after termination of heparin infusion has been reported.
This time window is clinically critical as the incidence of recurrent ischemia peaks in this period.
It has therefore been recommended to gradually taper heparin infusion continously rather than to discontinue it abruptly.
However, it is not known which dosing procedure is useful and whether it definitly reduces thrombin rebound.
The use of porcine skin as a biomedical model for the human integument is discussed with reference to the literature.
The epidermis and dermis can be used as a model as there are clear structural, functional and biochemical similarities with human skin layers.
The actual utilization of porcine skin in dermatological research is reviewed.
Practical difficulties are emphasized: in particular, the conditions required for use of porcine skin in experimental research, the most suitable breeds, and restrictions on biological interpretation of the results.
Laparoscopic procedures have attained increasing importance in the diagnosis and therapy of carcinoma of the cervix in recent years (Table 1) [34].
Laparoscopic pelvic and para-aortal lymphadenectomies are therefore performed to assess the operability of carcinoma of the cervix and for its staging.
In the case of primarily operable tumours, paraortal and pelvic lymphadenectomy is carried out by a laparoscopic procedure, and when the lymph nodes are negative nodes and there is no intra-abdominal metastasis the lymphadenectomy is combined with laparoscopically assisted vaginal hysterectomy.
If laparoscopy discloses positive lymph nodes, debulking can be carried out and the patient can be referred for radiotherapy.
In addition, laparoscopic procedures, even in combination with radical cervicectomy for early invasive carcinoma of the cervix, can mean conservation of the patient's fertility.
In the case of primarily inoperable tumours laparoscopy can be used to assess the lymph node status and the intra-abdominal tumour spread and to classify the patient's condition as potentially secondarily operable or inoperable.
In addition, in the case of primarily undertreated patients whose carcinoma of the cervix has been diagnosed incidentally in preparations of tissue examined following hysterectomy, posttreatment in the form of laparoscopic lymphadenectomy and laparoscopically assisted colpectomy can be performed.
The efficacy of buprenorphine in opioid dependent patients (n=20) was compared to methadone maintained subjects (n=20) in a randomized comparison trial.
Sublingual application of buprenorphine as an alternative synthetical opioid is being compared to methadone during a 24 week study period.
A trend (p=0.06) could be found in the retention rate of investigated patients being maintained on a mean dosage of 63 mg oral applicable methadone (racemat of L- and D-methadone) in comparison to the group on a mean dosage of 7,3 mg buprenorphine (sublingual tablets).
The dropout-rate of 11 subjects at the end of the study in the buprenorphine group was higher when compared to the dropout-rate of 5 in the methadone group.
There was no significant difference between the two groups over the treatment period in respect to additional consumption of opiates, benzodiazepines and cocaine as evaluated through urine toxicology.
The result in regard to compliance over the study period demonstrates that methadone appears to be the more successful oral opioid (p=0,04).
Nevertheless, efficacy of buprenorphine in maintenance could be demonstrated in the remaining subjects, and further studies with higher daily doses and a higher number of subjects have to be performed.
In patients with pleural or peritoneal mesothelioma, surgery is a technically difficult procedure.
Whereas those rare forms of localized pleural mesotheliomy are being detected incidentally and can be cured by complete resection, most patients with diffuse malignant mesothelioma present with an advanced stage of disease.
Most of these patients survive less than 12 months irrespective of the treatment modality.
For diffuse pleural mesothelioma, some favorable prognostic factors were identified: IMIG (International Mesothelioma Interest Group), stages I and II, epithelial type, age under 50, female gender.
In IMIG stages I and II, extended pleuropneumonectomy followed by chemo- and/or radiotherapy is recommended.
For this subset of patients, a median survival time of between 20 and 30 months is reported.
Pleurectomy and decortication are recommended as palliative surgical strategies against pleural effusion.
In patients with technically inoperable infiltration of the thoracic wall, irradiation is helpful; sometimes partial remission and relief of pain can be achieved by chemotherapy.
Fetal magnetocardiography (fMCG) registers the magnetic field generated by the fetal heart.
In contrast to the fetal elctrocardiogram, fECG permits non-invasive registration of fetal heart activity and documentation of all parts of the PQRST-wave-forms from the second trimenon onwards.
This facilitates the determination of cardiac time intervals and establishment of reference values for different stages of pregnancy.
We examined 53 women in 104 recordings from the 10th week of gestation onwards (1 to 10 recordings per individual).
The fMCG (37 magnetic channels, sampling rate 1024 Hz, bandwidth 1-200Hz) was recorded non-invasively over the mother's abdomen in a magnetically shielded room.
Registration of fetal heart beats was generally successful from the 20/21th week of gestation onwards.
In a few cases, fetal heart beats could be registered as early as in the 16th week.
Cardiac time intervals and amplitudes of fMCG increased concordantly with fetal growth.
Mean P wave duration increased from 31 to 49 ms (p < 0.05), PQ interval from 95 to 107 ms (n. s.) and QRS duration from 36 to 52 ms (p < 0.01).
The mean amplitudes of the P and R waves also increased.
To demonstrate imaging findings in inflammatory diseases of the pharynx and possible complications.
The purpose of this retrospective study was to analyse the complications of our arthroscopic procedures at the ankle joint.
In all patients we evaluated the treatment protocols and in 111 patients (79,3%) we also evaluated the clinical and radiologic results.
All in all we have found complications in 14 patients.
In 4 cases we have seen a delayed wound healing, in 2 cases a superficial infection, in 3 cases a deep infection, in 3 cases a neural damage and in 2 cases a phlebothrombosis.
Our study show, that the complication rate could be minimized by detailed knowledge of the anatomy, exact preoperative diagnostic and planing of the operation and careful preparation of the portals.
The use of a laser also shows a tendency to a lower complication rate.
Airbag inflation is associated with a loud noise.
This very short noise has a peak amplitude of 170 dB sound pressure level and can make otologic injuries.
We report a case of acoustic trauma after airbag inflation.
The 24-year-old man has hearing loss both side in the 3000- to 6000-Hz range and in the deep-frequency.
The possibility of acoustic trauma from airbag noise are probably much more common and need more attention in the clinic.
The incidence of primary malignant neoplasms of the pleura, the pericardium and the peritoneum in Germany has been rising since about the mid-1980 s. A continuing rise is expected until about 2020, predominantly due to the peak of asbestos processing in Germany between 1965 and 1980.
About 90 % of the mesotheliomas stored in the files of the German Mesothelioma Registry in Bochum are asbestos related and therefore possibly due to occupational exposure that may be compensated by the professional associations.
More than 500 mesotheliomas annually can be diagnosed in the German Mesothelioma Registry.
In this first part of the series on mesotheliomas, current concepts on etiology and pathogenesis as well as diagnostic procedures and standards are discussed.
At the present, specific chromosomal or genetic defects that constantly give rise to a mesothelioma are not known.
The initiation and progression of malignant mesotheliomas is a highly complex mechanism that is based on individual genetic alterations.
A reliable diagnosis is the basis for therapeutic, prognostic and medicolegal conseques; in general, it can be achieved by thoracoscopic inspection with selected biopsy.
Surgery may gain a more important role in the therapy of malignant tumors of serosal membranes not only in palliative, but also in potential curative approaches if the diagnosis can be made at earlier tumor stages.
Acute gastrointestinal bleeding is a life threatening disease with a mortality rate of 10%.
Upper gastrointestinal bleeding occurs more frequent (85%) and more severe compared to lower gastrointestinal bleeding.
The medical history may be helpful in the diagnosis of the bleeding source.
Prognosis and mortality are dependent on intensity of bleeding, reflected by clinical signs such as shock, hemoglobin level, transfused blood units, hematemesis, presence of comorbidity and age of the patient.
Furthermore rebleeding is associated with an increased mortality.
Therefore one major goal in the treatment of gastrointestinal bleeding is to avoid rebleeding.
Joints are innervated by nociceptive nerve fibres (nociceptors), which are only activated by tissue-damaging stimuli.
This activation causes pain in conscious humans.
The sensory terminals of many nociceptors in the tissue are sensitized by inflammatory processes.
Under these conditions, normally innocuous and non-painful stimuli are sufficient to activate nociceptors and to elicit pain.
The effect of inflammatory mediators such as bradykinin and prostaglandins is important for the process of sensitization.
In addition to their sensory function, many nociceptors have an efferent function.
They evoke a neurogenic inflammation by the release of neuropeptides such as substance P and calcitonin gene-related peptide into the tissue.
The efferent function of nociceptors contributes to the generation of inflammatory lesions of the tissue.
Autolyzed, antigen-extracted, allogeneic bone (AAA bone) is prepared from cortical bones of human organ donors.
AAA bone possesses osteoinductive properties as it delivers BMPs from its bone matrix.
Within a prospective study, 37 cranial defects were reconstructed using AAA bone implants over a period of more than 7 years.
The patients were followed-up at standardized intervals.
Roentgenographic assessments and bone scintigraphies revealed osseous integration and remodelling of the AAA bone implants.
In one quarter of the cases re-entry was performed 10 to 18 months after the cranioplasty (removal of osteosynthesis material, recurrence of tumor).
All nine AAA bone reconstructions showed bleeding surfaces and bony integrations.
A bone biopsy was taken from the center of one of these AAA bone implants and this showed new bone formation originating from the surface of the implant.
In one case an AAA bone implant was lost due to infection.
This is noteworthy as in approximately one third of the cases the bone implants were in direct contact with the frontal sinus.
The clinical results clearly emphasize the therapeutical benefit of AAA bone for cranioplasties.
Large AAA bone chips from human skull bones facilitate the reconstruction of the skull's convexity, especially when sterolithography-based operation planning is performed.
Saphenous vein harvesting remains a 20 % source of morbidity in patients who require lower extremity bypass or coronary artery bypass grafting.
In an attempt to reduce the complications associated with this procedure, minimally invasive video-assisted vein harvesting is propagated.
The technique uses currently available endoscopic equipment with mechanical retraction to dissect the great saphenous vein with two limited incisions.
The dissection is visualized on the video monitor to isolate and control side branches by clips.
The vein is removed for reverse arterial bypass grafting or dissection is completed for an in situ bypass procedure.
Initial experience with ten patients undergoing peripheral bypass procedures showed a mean vein-preparation time of 60 min.
Two of seven in situ bypass procedures were complicated by side branch damage controlled through longer skin incision.
After a mean follow-up of 12 months, all bypasses are patent.
Taking our own experience as well as that reported in the literature into consideration, aspects of cost-effectiveness are discussed.
Obstructions of the nasolacrimal duct occur frequently (70%) in term newborns and are symptomatic in 6%.
The reason is an incomplete canalization and differentiation of the lacrimal duct during the fetal period.
A persisting membran between the duct and the nasal cavity at the level of the valve of Hasner in combination with a proximal valvelike obstruction at the junction of the lacrimal canal and sac may cause a dacryocystocele by fluid accumulation.
We describe a term newborn with a bilateral dacryocystocele and respiratory distress.
The recognition of a medical discipline on a European level as an independent specialty depends on its registration in the medical directives of the European Union.
With supreme effort, the oral and maxillofacial surgeons of the EU reached this goal in 1989.
The UEMS - Section of Stomatology and Oromaxillofacial Surgery - became the forum for discussion of the relevant problems with representatives of the member states and officials of the European Commission.
Thanks to its activities, oral and maxillofacial surgery is now recognized as an independent specialty with about 3800 specialists in 11 European countries.
A biatrial pacemaker was inserted in a 68-year-old female with paroxysmal atrial fibrillation and atrial flutter refractory to antiarrhythmic drugs based on a sick-sinus-syndrome and concomitant interatrial conduction delay.
One electrode positioned in the right atrium and another electrode located in the coronary sinus were connected to a dual-chamber pacemaker.
The electrode in the right atrium was connected to the atrial channel, the electrode in the coronary sinus to the ventricular channel.
The pacemaker was programmed in DDD-mode with an AV-delay of 30 ms.
Under a chronic antiarrhythmic medication with 160 mg sotalol per day there was no evidence for recurrent episodes of atrial tachyarrhythmias in the patient's history, 24-h-Holter-ECG, nor in the memory of the pacemaker during a follow-up of 8 months.
The AB0 blood types, first discovered by Karl Landsteiner in 1901, can be genotyped with the PCR method of Lee and Chang [6].
Using two primer pairs, allele-specific sequences can be amplified and, after digestion with restriction endonucleases, visualized by silver staining on a polyacrylamide gel.
In a southwest German population the allele frequencies were: Allele A = 0.2704, allele B = 0.0741 and allele 0 = 0.6556.
With the method of Lee and Chang [6] only the nucleotide positions 261 and 703 are considered so that out of 280 individuals 10 (3.57%) showed differences between the AB0 genotype and phenotype, because it was not possible to differentiate between A and 02 alleles.
Based on the one experience and the information that is available in the literature indications for ankle arthroscopy are given, surgical equipment, patient placement and surgical technique of different procedures are described.
Finally the results and possible complications are presented.
Removal of loose bodies as well as synovectomies in case of an acute infection or rheumatoid arthritis are good indication.
Arthroscopic treatment of anterior pathology in the athletic ankle need a thorough diagnostic work-up; the results of the treatment do not always meet the expectations of this especially demanding population.
Cartilage treatment is technically possible, however, long term results are still missing.
This is also true for the treatment on osteochondritis dissecans.
In patients with degenerative joint disease arthroscopic debridement can only lead to a temporary benefit.
Arthroscopic assisted arthrodeses (AAA) is technically demanding, but can serve as an excellent alternative to conventional open techniques.
The complication rate in ankle arthroscopy is high compared to other joints, which is especially true for neurologic complications and postoperative infections.
This should be addressed when performing the informed consent.
Recent prospective randomised trials dealed with the optimal extent of surgical resection as well as with preoperative therapy modalities in pancreatic, rectal and breast cancer.
In pancreatic cancer extended lymphadenectomy did not improve overall survival.
Total mesorectal excision remarkably changed surgery for rectal cancer.
Rate of local recurrence of rectal cancer could be significantly reduced by preoperative irradiation.
In advanced rectal cancers curative resection and sphincter preservation seems possible due to multimodal preoperative therapy.
It has been demonstrated that in appropriate cases breastpreserving resection is comparable to mastectomy with respect to overall survival.
Up to now it is not quite clear if sentinel node sampling is equivalent to routine lymphadenectomy.
Following neoadjuvant chemotherapy breastpreservation rate is significantly higher, but survival is not significantly increased.
Introduction and Methods: A 0.5 T open-configuration MR system allows free access to the patient via a 58-cm-wide opening on both sides of the machine.
A newly developed system for needle guidance enables the examiner to perform biopsies in combination with real-time imaging and to position laser fibers in the human body.
For imaging, a 2D gradient echo sequence is used (TR 19 ms, TE 9 ms, flip angle 30  °, FOV 24 x 24 cm, slice thickness 10 mm matrix 256 x 128).
The acquired images are displayed on two LCD screens localized within the MR system, thus allowing an interactive needle guidance.
This procedure is illustrated by a case report.
Angiotensin-converting enzyme (ACE) inhibitors are established drugs for the treatment of patients with heart failure and hypertension.
There is mounting evidence to suggest that ACE inhibitors may be used for different indications as well.
The rational for the use of ACE inhibitors is to block the vasoconstrictive effects mediated by angiotensin II.
The hemodynamic profile of ACE inhibitors is modified by additional effects such as interference with the degredation of bradykinin and accumulation of prostaglandin and nitric oxide (NO).
Thus ACE inhibitors may be successful in preventing the negative effects of vasoconstriction on regional circulation.
Since vasoconstriction, particularly of the mesenteric vasculature appears to be largely mediated by the renin-angiotensin-axis, ACE inhibitors are assumed to be effective in treating or avoiding gut mucosal hypoperfusion.
The critically ill intensive care patient at risk of developing multiple organ dysfunction syndrome (MODS) is still a major therapeutic challenge.
Intravenous preparations of ACE inhibitors may broaden our therapeutic armamentarium for these patients.
However, several questions about the exact mechanisms of ACE inhibitors, such as the ideal substance and the optimal dose, are still open.
Moreover, further work needs to be done to definitely determine whether ACE inhibitors may be helpful to prevent or treat (micro-) circulatory catastrophe in these patients.
The pharmacologic properties of ACE inhibitors provide an exciting stepping stone for future research in this field.
Hypoparathyroidism (HP) results from deficient parathyroid hormone (PTH) secretion, pseudohypoparathyreoidism (PHP) results form decreased PTH action on its target organs.
Between May 1996 and 1999, a total of 186 endoscopic spinal operations were performed to treat unstable injuries and pathologic fractures.
The operative spinal interventions followed the classic sequence of excision of part of a vertebral body, partial replacement of the vertebral body with bone harvested from the iliac crest, and implantation of a titanium plate to stabilize the part to be fused.
In 62% of these cases we performed primary dorsal straightening with a fixateur interne.
The serious complications were aortic leakage and deep infection in the area of the graft and the implant, each of which occurred in 1 case.
Comparisons with the literature showed approximately the same rate of spinal complications as with open surgery, while the rate of morbidity connected with the surgical approach was reduced to a third in the patient population treated endoscopically, with correspondingly positive implications for the postoperative analgesic requirement and for convalescence.
Various risk scores have been developed for the assessment of operative risk in cardiac surgery.
Although risk stratification has been acknowledged as a useful tool to analyze trends in therapy and changes in patient populations, its relevance in assessing the indication for surgery has been questioned.
It was the goal of this prospective study to compare 6 common risk scores with regard to the predictive value for mortality in individual patients.
Between September 1998 and February 1999 all adult patients undergoing heart surgery were prospectively scored according to the following scores: initial Parsonnet, Cleveland Clinic, French, Euro, Pons, and the Ontario Province Risk score.
Early lethality was assessed within 30 days postoperatively.
Follow-up was completed in 504 patients.
With the exception of the Ontario Province Risk score, lethality in the high risk group was overestimated by all scores, whereas lethality in low to moderate risk groups was underestimated by several scores.
Mean scores of surviving and deceased patients showed a broad overlap with high standard deviations.
Preoperative risk scores are effective tools for stratification of patient populations and the analysis of surgical outcome.
With the aid of risk scores, operative risk can be sufficiently predicted for patient populations or subpopulations.
The Euro score best predicted the outcome of our patients.
However, when the indication for surgery is to be determined in an individual patient, risk scores should be only considered as an orientation in the decision process.
Background and objective: A complicated course of erysipelas is not uncommon.
Bullous, haemorrhagic, necrotic and purulent lesions may be encountered.
Today no reliable data exist as to which constitutional factors renders a patient at risk for developing complicated erysipelas though several risk factors, particularly diabetes mellitus, are often suggested.
Based on the analysis of patients with erysipelas at the Department of Dermatology in Graz, factors determining the risk for complicated erysipelas should be identified.
Patients/Methods: In a retrospective case-control study clinical data sheets of 766 in- patients treated at the department were evaluated with respect to the course of the erysipelas and with respect to potential risk factors.
Results: General risk factors for local complications were location at the lower extremities, pre-existing hepatic or renal disease, hyperuricaemia, and diabetes mellitus.
Hepatic and renal disease and - to a lesser extent - diabetes particularly predisposed for bullous and haemorrhagic lesions, while vascular occlusive disease enhanced the risk for ne- crotic lesions.
Conclusions: Location and hepatic and renal disease are the most important risk factors, while diabetes is probably of less significance than previously suggested.
Patients with end-stage liver disease frequently develop combined coagulopathies due to increased procoagulant and fibrinolytic turnover as well as thrombocytopenia.
The onset of clinical symptoms of a haemorrhagic diathesis requires balanced substitution of coagulation factors, since fresh frozen plasma alone does not always maintain a sufficient haemostatic potential in these patients.
This substitution commonly follows standard rules based on the assumption that 0.5 - 1 IU of a coagulation factor or inhibitor concentrate given per kg body weight will increase its endogenous activity by 1%.
We set out to investigate the validity of this standard regime in patients with end-stage liver disease scheduled for orthotopic liver transplantation.
Fifty-one adult patients were prospectively studied.
In 37 patients with antithrombin III (AT III) activity <70%, an AT III preparation (Kybernin, Behring, Marburg, Germany) was given preoperatively (mean dose 2616 +/- 207 IU) following standard calculations in order to increase endogenous activity to 80%.
Twenty-seven of the patients had chronic hepatic failure (CHF group) with histologically proven cirrhosis and 10 had acute hepatic failure (AHF group).
Blood samples were drawn prior to a 15-min infusion of AT III concentrate and 30 min thereafter.
In 14 patients with prothrombin time (PT) <40%, AT III levels had been corrected earlier during the clinical course to achieve activities >70%.
Prothrombin complex (PPSB, Beriplex, Behring, Marburg, Germany) was substituted (mean dose 2304 +/- 289 IU) to increase procoagulant activity to PT >60%.
Blood samples were drawn in the same fashion as in the AT III group.
The amounts of AT III and PPSB concentrates ( AT III, [IU/kg];  PPSB [IU/kg]) required to increase AT III activity and PT, respectively, by 1% were calculated.
Standard calculations for AT III substitution indicated AT III recovery in all 37 patients who received AT III concentrate.
However, there was a statistically significant difference between patients with CLF and ALF.
In patients with CLF,  AT III was found to be 0.8 IU/kg ( +/- 0.1 SEM) and in those with ALF it was 1.5 IU/kg ( +/- 0.1 SEM) (P<0.05,  t-test).
In patients treated with PPSB concentrate,  PPSB was 1.6 U/kg ( +/- 0.2 SEM) for both CLF and ALF groups.
In patients with end stage liver disease standard rules for substitution with AT III-concentrate are adequate only for patients with CLF.
In patients with ALF higher AT III doses are required to achieve the expected effect on endogenous AT III activity.
Procoagulant activity, as reflected by PT, can be increased by 1% when 1.6 IU/kg PPSB concentrate is given.
However, this study shows the effects of coagulation concentrates only 30 min after administration.
An increased volume of distribution and increased turnover may explain the poor recovery of AT III activity in the ALF group, indicating that the dose of coagulation concentrate should be estimated against the background of the patient's clinical symptoms and diagnosis.
Fatigue is a common symptom in patients with multiple sclerosis.
Rapid exhaustion and reduced exercise tolerance leads to difficulties in maintaining a normal daily life for many patients.
Regular resting and short breaks can help to compensate this to a  certain degree.
A sixteen year old girl with juvenile rheumatoid arthritis suffered two episodes of toxic shock syndrome within a short period of time.
Both occasions were associated with menstruation.
Mycoplasma hominis was isolated in the tracheal secretions once.
Discussion: The etiology of the toxic shock syndrome has been extensively described.
The toxic shock syndrome toxin-1 acts as a superantigen in toxic shock syndrome and interestingly a similar mechanism is discussed in juvenile rheumatoid arthritis.
This case report demonstrates the possibility of a close relationship between toxic shock syndrome and juvenile rheumatoid arthritis and raises the suspicion of a similar immunopathogenetic process.
Porokeratos of Mibelli is a rare inherited disorder of epidermal keratinization, whose pathogenesis is not fully understood.
The common clinical feature is a erythematous plaque surrounded by a hyperkeratotic border.
The histopathologic hallmark is a parakeratotic cornoid lamella.
An unusual case of porokeratosis gigantea, a morphological variant of classical porokeratosis of Mibelli, is reported.
The pathogenesis, taking in account especially the clonal hypothesis and premalignant nature of porokeratosis, is discussed.
With the introduction of the non-benzodiazepine hypnotics zopiclone and zolpidem it was expected to have hypnotics without side effects and risks characteristically seen with benzodiazepines.
We report two cases with high-dose usage and dependency of non-benzodiazepine hypnotics.
Both patients were prescribed the drugs to treat sleep disturbances occuring during a depressive episode.
While one patient had a polysubstance abuse there was no evidence for an abuse history in the other patient.
To reduce withdrawal symptoms long-acting benzodiazepines were given to both patients.
Thus, it seems that not only patients with a history of substance abuse but also patients with a psychiatric disorder are at risk for abuse of non-benzodiazepine hypnotics.
Considering the increasing number of case reports with abuse and dependence of zopiclone and zolpidem it seems necessary to reevaluate the dependency risk of the currently available non-benzodiazepine hypnotics.
Fractures of the proximal radius in children may lead to deformities of the radial head and functional disturbance of pro- and supination.
However, traumatization is not only caused by the injury itself, but may also occur secondary to surgical reduction, manipulation of fracture fragments and excessive physiotherapy.
In a prospective long-term follow-study (2-20 years after trauma) of 38 children with displaced proximal radius fractures we found functional disturbances in 11 % of children only.
These were not caused by radial head deformities, which were present on 83 % of follow-up radiographs.
Functional impairment was mainly seen after open reduction or secondary growth disturbances.
On follow-up radiographs all conservatively treated fracture angulations up to 60  ° had corrected themselves spontaneously.
In view of the high complication rates after open reduction and the poor functional results, as well as the inconvenience for the pediatric patient and the economic aspects, we recommend a primary conservative treatment concept of proximal radius fractures in children.
Patients who have undergone cardiac surgery with use of extracorporeal circulation frequently reveal marked hypovolaemia in spite of a highly positive fluid balance.
This is thought to be due to transient microvascular damage and extravascular fluid shift.
Further volume replacement to achieve haemodynamic stability in the postoperative period may cause fluid overload and congestive heart failure.
The present study was designed to investigate whether this fluid overload could be avoided by using a hypertonic-hyperoncotic solution (group I: HHL, 10% hydroxyethylstarch 200/0.5 in 7.2% saline) instead of two different standard colloid solutions (group II: HA, 5% albumin; group III: HES, 6% hydroxyethylstarch in 0.9% saline).
Purpose: The temporomandibular joint is a place of motion where release of proinflammatory cytokines like interleukin-1 (IL-1) induces cartilage destruction via production of nitric oxide (NO).
The purpose of this study was to evaluate the effects of continuous passive motion in the form of cyclic stretch on the synthesis of inducible nitric oxide synthase (iNOS).
Methods: Articular chondrocytes were harvested from rabbit cartilage slices and cultured in F12 medium supplemented with 10% fetal calf serum.
Subsequently, cells (105/ml per well) were transferred to Flexercell plates, grown to 90% confluency, and subjected to one of the following regimens: (1) no mechanical strain (10 Hz, 20% elongation rate); (2) rhIL-1 (1 ng/ml); (3) mechanical strain; (4) mechanical strain and rhIL-1.
The cells were exposed to cyclic stretch for 24 h. Thereafter, cells were trypsinized and centrifuged on microscope slides in a cytospin centrifuge.
The presence of iNOS was determined by indirect immunoperoxidase staining using polyclonal rabbit anti-iNOS as primary antibodies, and goat anti-rabbit IgG conjugated with horseradish peroxidase (HRP) as secondary antibodies.
Diaminobenzidine was used as substrate for HRP.
Total NO production was spectrophotometrically measured in the supernatants of cultures using Greiss reaction.
All experiments were done in triplicates and the statistical significance was analyzed by Student's t-test.
Results: Cells with treatment 1 and 3 did not exhibit presence of iNOS.
IL-1-treated cells in group 2 exhibited intense peroxidase staining.
Cells in group 4 exposed to IL-1 and mechanical stress showed staining with considerably less intensity.
Control cells treated with normal rabbit IgG as a primary antibody did not exhibit peroxidase staining.
The data were further confirmed by measurement of statistically significant differences of NO levels in supernatants assessed in the four different treatment groups.
Conclusion: Our findings suggest that continuous passive motion exerts anti-inflammatory effects on chondrocytes, downregulating the quantity of iNOS -positive cells.
Since NO acts as an intracellular, transcellular, and cytotoxic molecule, it has a basic importance for proper post-traumatic and postoperative TMJ function as well as the course and therapy of inflammatory TMJ diseases.
Recently, we presented an implantable piezoelectrical hearing aid transducer.
Its characteristics make it suitable for implantation in patients with sensorineural hearing loss.
The transducer transmits micromechanical vibrations instead of sound into the hearing organ.
Efficiency of the transducer implant was investigated in ten cat ears.
After determining preoperative (acoustical) BERA threshold, the middle ear was opened and the piezoelectrical transducer coupled to various ossicles or the perilymph.
BERA responses were recorded following stimulation of umbo, long incus process, stapes head, stapes foot plate, and vestibulum.
By comparing the acoustical and mechanical threshold, a correlation was found between the stimulus level of acoustical and mechanical stimulation.
An electrical transducer voltage of 1 Vrms* was equivalent to sound-pressure levels between 100 and 128 dB SPL at the tympanic membrane.
To judge hearing impression, stimulus-dependent latencies of the early acoustically and mechanically evoked potentials (waves P1 to P5) and their thresholds were analyzed.
After coupling the piezoelectrical transducer to the long incus process, latencies corresponded well to stimulation.
They were almost completely similar when the equivalent sound-pressure level of 100 dB SPL was achieved by the transducer voltage level.
Pyoderma gangrenosum was first described in 1930 by Brunsting, Goeckermann and O'Leary.
Nevertheless we found some illustrations in an atlas on dermatology, published by Marie-Nicolas Devergie in the first half of the 19th century, which appear to be pyoderma gangrenosum.
In addition to discussions of typical syphilitic affections of the skin, Devergie's "Clinique de la Maladie Syphilitique" includes illustrations of gangrenous ulcers, which appeared unexpectedly after local and systemic therapy with mercury.
Devergie interpreted those enlarging ulcers as a side effect of mercury therapy.
Thus we were able to find evidence of pyoderma gangrenosum more than 100 years before first description in 1930.
The etiology of this clinical picture is still unsettled.
The favorite postulate has been a bacterial genesis which was the subject of numerous publications until the 1960s.
Multiple-system atrophy (MSA) is characterized by progressive autonomic failure with cerebellar, pyramidal and extrapyramidal signs.
In MSA patients laryngoscopy often reveals unilateral or bilateral abductor vocal fold palsies.
However, assessment of sites of obstruction and their severity is needed.
We report our clinical experience in managing a 56-year-old, obese male MSA patient (1.76 m height, 100 kg weight, BMI 32.3 kg/m2) who was admitted for evaluation of snoring and excessive daytime sleepiness.
Endoscopy while awake demonstrated an incomplete abductor vocal fold palsy.
Polysomnography confirmed heavy snoring with arousals (11.1/h) and an RDI of 1.4/h.
Sleep efficiency was low (51.9%) due to long intermittent awake periods.
Sleep videoendoscopy of the upper airway proved the entire pharynx to be open during REM and non-REM sleep.
During inspiration fluttering movements of the vocal cords caused the snoring.
This was regularly terminated by arousals.
The further treatment is discussed.
In general, glottic snoring without daytime stridor is rare and has only been described in MSA patients.
However, certain of these patients will also be pharyngeal snorers.
The source of the sound and site of obstruction can only be diagnosed by sleep videoendoscopy.
Introduction: Homografts for valve replacement are indicated in acute valve endocarditis.
It is assumed that they possess anti-infective properties.
Homografts are an established indication in aortic valve replacement.
We present our early results with homografts for mitral valve replacement in acute endocarditis.
The surgical management of enlarged inferior turbinates has been actively debated for more than a century.
The second part of this review decribes the following techniques: laterofracture, submucous turbinectomy, concho-antropexy, partial turbinectomy, anterior turbinectomy, inferior turbinoplasty, total turbinectomy, and vidian neurectomy.
Indications, advantages, disadvantages, complications, and controversies of each treatment modalitiy are reviewed and discussed.
Partial or submucosal resection should be prefered, because there are moderate side effects and the amount of turbinate excised can be altered according the degree of symptomatology.
Total turbinectomy or vidian neurectomy are indicated if all other treatment attemps do not succeed.
Acute oxalosis is an important disorder causing serious abnormalities.
Acute oxalosis may come about by ethylene glycol poisoning; in recent years iatrogenic cases of acute oxalosis have also been described following iv treatments of naftidrofuryl, a vasodilator.
Furthermore, chronic asymptomatic intestinal oxalosis may turn symptomatic by a superimposed major load of oxalate.
Acute oxalosis results in acute renal failure; in addition oxalate-induced angiopathy may be associated with necrosis of affected tissue.
The diagnosis of acute oxalosis requires a demonstration of oxalate crystals in the urine and in other affected tissues.
In terms of therapy, hemodialysis should be used promptly in cases of ethylene glycol poisoning and a worsening of the renal function.
In cases of a secondary chronic intestinal oxalosis prophylactic measures such as maintaining an elevated urinary flow rate and prescribing oral calcium supplements will be helpful.
Generalized granuloma annulare is a rare variant of granuloma annulare affecting the trunk and extremities with a multitude of lesions.
In contrast to localized granuloma annulare, generalized granuloma annulare occurs in older patients, shows a stronger association with diabetes, and is characteristically chronic.
Like our 55-year-old patient, most patients present with papules and annular plaques; less often, macular or non-annular lesions may be encountered.
Histology often fails to show necrobiotic or necrotic connective tissue changes demarcated by a palisading granuloma.
Instead, there are diffuse dermal, band-like or nodular aggregations of histiocytes intermingled with some multinucleated giant cells and a predominantly lymphocytic infiltrate in the periphery.
Because of its special characteristics, it has been suggested that generalized granuloma annulare might constitute a separate disease entity and that it should be classed among the primary cutaneous histiocytoses as a diffuse dermal histiocytosis.
Using immunohistochemistry to determine the macrophage phenotype of the lesional histiocytes, we have shown that generalized granuloma annulare is not a cutaneous histiocytosis.
Neither MS-1 high-molecular-weight protein, a new specific marker for cutaneous non-Langerhans cell histiocytoses, nor CD1a, the well-known marker for Langerhans cells and Langerhans cell histiocytoses, is expressed by the lesional histiocytes of our patient.
In contrast, the antigen expression pattern was diagnostic for non-infectious granulomas and was highly similar to that in localized granuloma annulare.
In contrast to the successful treatment of localized granuloma annulare reported with intralesional interferon -1, systemic treatment with interferon -2b (9x106 units three times a week) was ineffective.
The aims of the study were: (1) to predict reversal time from intensive atracurium blockade; and (2) to determine the optimal time of neostigmine administration during recovery from atracurium blockade, i.e., the time at which the administration of neostigmine results in the shortest total recovery time (time from administration of last supplemental dose of atracurium to train-of-four [TOF] ratio 0.70), and at the same time results in the shortest time from administration of neostigmine to TOF ratio 0.70.
The spontaneous and neostigmine-facilitated recovery in 52 healthy women anaesthetised with thiopentone, fentanyl, droperidol, and nitrous oxide was followed.
Post-tetanic count (PTC) of TOF stimulation of the ulnar nerve and mechanomyography were used for monitoring neuromuscular transmission.
The neuromuscular blockade was induced with atracurium 0.6 mg/kg and supplemental doses of 0.15 mg/kg were given when the first twitch response in the TOF (TH1) had recovered to 20%.
Neostigmine 0.036 mg/kg body weight was given at different levels of neuromuscular blockade to 37 of the patients.
Multiple regression analyses including pre-reversal time (time from administration of the last atracurium dose to neostigmine administration), PTC, weight, and age of the patients suggest that pre-reversal time is the best predictor of reversal time: reversal time=27.3 min-(0.89xpre-reversal time [min]; (SEE=6.0 min).
If pre-reversal time is unknown, PTC can be used: reversal time=24 min-(4.5xln PTC) at time of reversal); (SEE=6.8 min).
Total recovery time was 47 min (SEM=2.0 min, n=15) in the patients allowed to recover spontaneously, and 29 min (SEM=1.2 min, n=29) in the patients reversed by neostigmine; the difference of 18 min (SE diff 2.0 min) was significant (P<0.0005).
The level of blockade indicated by PTC (1 - 24) at the time of reversal had no influence on the total recovery time.
The spontaneous recovery times from reappearance of TH1 and TH1=10% to TOF ratio 0.70 were 29.2 min (SEM=1.7 min) and 24.4 min (SEM=2.6 min), respectively.
The results suggest that pre-reversal time is the strongest predictor of reversal time when neostigmine is administered during intense atracurium blockade.
To achieve the optimal time-saving effect, neostigmine must be given 18 min (the time saved by giving neostigmine) plus 7 to 11 min (needed for neostigmine to reach its peak effect), giving a total of 25 to 29 min before TOF ratio 0.70.
As TH1 is between 1% and 10% 25 to 29 min before TOF ratio 0.70 is reached during spontaneous recovery, the optimal level of neuromuscular blockade for neostigmine administration in atracurium blockade is when TH1 is between 1% and 10%.
Reversal time can be predicted as 27.3 min-(0.89xpre-reversal time (min), and the optimal time of neostigmine administration in atracurium blockade appears to be when TH1 is 1% - 10%.
A seminar for hospital physicians in management positions (Württembergische Verwaltungs- und Wirtschaftsakademie, Stuttgart) in October 1994 illustrated the immediate relevance of W. R. Bion's book Experiences in Groups and Other Papers, published in 1961.
The aim of this article, recalling Bion's experiences in groups by presenting in seminar's leadership principles, is to show how these experiences can be applied to an understanding of the individual.
If continuous seizure activity lasts longer than 5 minutes generalized tonic-clonic seizures require prompt treatment, if significant morbidity and mortality are to be avoided.
The mortality varies (mean: 20%) depending on patient age and etiology.
Control of status epilepticus is achieved by benzodiazepines in about 80% of cases: Lorazepam is recommended due to its longer-acting effects on the central nervous system.
To maintain the anticonvulsive effect phenytoin is usually administered intravenously.
Fosphenytoin (not approved in Germany) has advantages over phenytoin, because it can be given three times more rapidly and produces fewer side effects.
The IV use of valproic acid in status epilepticus seems to be promising, but needs further evaluation.
There is no generally accepted treatment protocol for the therapy of persistent seizure activity lasting more than 60 minutes (i. e., refractory status epilepticus).
Usually phenobarbital, or general anesthesia with thiopental or pentobarbital are treatment recommendations.
In recent reports, the administration of midazolam or propofol proved to be effective and well-tolerated.
Since the life span of our society is increasing and the expectation of high functional demands is growing more and more older people take part in sports activities emphasises the necessity of early diagnosis of rotator cuff lesions and their correct treatment.
The goal of any diagnostic means should be a proper treatment of rotator cuff lesions according to the detected pathology.
New arthroscopic techniques to surgically reconstruct rotator cuff tears have brought the operative repair techniques another step further.
In cases of large and complex cuff tears the surgeon can individually select an adequate reconstruction procedure which includes anatomical-, partial-, tendon-transfer and muscle-transfer repairs.
In cases of irreparable tears with cuff-tear arthropathy and consecutive superior migration of the humeral head hemiarthroplasty or the inverse deltoid prosthesis have to be considered.
Based on clinical, radiological and arthroscopic findings we developed algorithms that will lead to the best suited procedure for a given lesion.
Almost all patients with amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS) experience symptoms of nocturnal hypoventilation during the course of the illness.
These symptoms can develop  years before death and may severely affect quality of life.
Non-invasive intermittent home mechanical ventilation (HMV) via mask is a possible palliative measure for  these symptoms, which is not often used in  Germany.
We report on our experience with HMV in 24 patients with ALS.
Our data show a good palliative effect in 17 of 24 treated patients.
Severe complications did not occur.
The mean ventilation time at present is  14 months.
Available options and their  consequences need to be discussed in detail with patients and relatives before HMV is  initiated.
Many clinical studies have been performed investigating corneal endothelial cell loss after penetrating keratoplasty using different preservation methods.
Most studies, however, included variable follow-up intervals, neglecting the dynamic cell loss over the course of time.
The aim of this study was to perform endothelial cell evaluation 5 years after penetrating keratoplasty using two different storage methods.
Primary sclerosing cholangitis (PSC) is generally associated with ulcerative colitis (UC).
The disease typically progresses slowly, but ultimately, and leads to cirrhosis, liver failure or bile duct cancer.
PSC patients with simultanous ulcerative colitis are also at higher risk for colorectal cancer.
At the present time, there is no effective treatment for PSC, although preliminary data show encouraging results after treatment with ursodeoxycholic acid.
However, there are no data concerning the delay or prevention of progress of the disease with this drug, because follow-up time is not yet long enough.
Isolated bile duct strictures should be treated endoscopically.
The possible effect of proctocolectomy on the course of PSC is controversial.
Liver transplantation is the therapy of choice for PSC in its final stage.
The 5-year survival rate (89 %) is significantly better than after transplantation for other indications.
Patients with ulcerative colitis have to be followed up by lifelong colonoscopy.
Although the course of UC after transplantation is mostly asymptomatic, these patients are at higher risk for colorectal cancer.
On 3 June 1998 a high-speed train (Inter City Express, ICE) collided with a bridge at a speed of 200 km/h.
The bridge collapsed and the rear wagons of the train were pushed into it with the power of the rear engine.
The accident caused 101 deaths and 103 injuries.
Four minutes after the accident the alarm was raised, and 16 minutes after the accident the first doctor was on the scene, arriving from Celle, approx.
Severe complications after chiropractic treatments rarely occur.
They happen mostly when manipulating the atlantoaxial and the craniovertebral articulations or when not attending to the contraindications like partial dislocation and hemivertebra.
Therefore, x-ray pictures from the part of the vertebral region to be treated are inevitable and likewise the medical scientific associations demand them uniformly to minimize the risks.
Nevertheless, our case-report shows also inconspicuous radiological findings do not exclude local tumor infestation of the bones with possible deleterious results for the patient treated by the chiropractor.
In patients with painful, possibly hemorrhagic vesicles or black crusts, especially on hands/fingers or face/neck with typical history (contact to cows or feral/cats) the possibility of a cowpox/catpox infection has to be considered.
The clinical diagnosis can be confirmed with the electron microscopy; cytoplasmic inclusions may be detected histologically.
Further useful diagnostic tools are the identification of the cowpox/catpox virus by PCR or in cell culture as well as serological tests to detect virus specific antibodies.
We report the development of typical skin lesions of a cowpox/catpox infection in two female patients who had contact with cows or cats.
Recent diagnostic and therapeutic approaches are also discussed.
The laboratory findings of hemolysis, elevated liver enzymes and low platelets are signs of an acute pregnancy complication often associated with abdominal pain and intrauterine growth retardation.
A high coincidence with symptoms of preeclampsia is observed.
The high rate of complications and the restitution of laboratory findings to normal values following cessation of pregnancy have led to the general recommendation of immediate delivery for about a decade.
However, the fact that HELLP syndrome can also occur for up to 1 week post-partum and the results of studies on prolongation of pregnancy call this former concept of management into question, in particular, since there is a high rate of hemostasiological complications after cesarean section in acute HELLP syndrome.
Because of the correlation of complications of HELLP syndrome with those of severe preeclampsia, the indication for delivery should be based on the signs of preeclampsia and additional clinical features.
The results of studies on prolongation of pregnancies in HELLP syndrome and severe preeclampsia support this concept.
Innervation of the head and neck differs from other regions of the body in certain respects.
In particular, besides the external cuneate nucleus, thick-calibre neck muscle afferents project directly, to the vestibular nuclear complex.
This projection is most prominent in segments C2 and 3 and is sparse or absent in more caudal segments.
Thus, proprioceptive neck muscle afferents gain direct access to vestibulospinal, vestibulooculomotor and other secondary or even higher order vestibular neurons that receive labyrinthine input.
Proprioceptive input via indirect spinovestibular pathways is also most prominent from C2 and 3 compared to more caudal levels.
Likewise, thin calibre, mainly nociceptive afferents from cervical segments are channelled via the parabrachial nuclei in the rostral pons to limbic structures different from the targets of thoracolumbar afferents.
It is tempting to consider these neuroantomical peculiarities relevant for the pathogenesis of the puzzling symptoms after whiplash injury.
In some recent German textbooks of pain management there is maintained that psychological dependence to opioids in pain patients is not a real problem.
The evidence for this statement is reviewed.
Real bone tumors are rarely encountered in the daily routine of radiological practice.
Therefore, for a general radiologist there is no need for a specialist knowledge on this field.
However, he should be able to distinguish benign from malignant lesions in order to avoid unnecessary biopsies.
A systematic approach towards osteolytic lesions, e. g. according to the classification of Lodwick, is mandatory.
CT and MRI are indicated to clear up the anatomy in areas of superposition artefacts in conventional radiology and to determine the inner structure of a lesion, e. g. fatty tissue, liquid/solid.
This paper highlights the advantages and disadvantages and the cost-effective use of the imaging modalities including scintigraphy in the diagnosis of bone tumors and tumor-like lesions.
Guidelines for the management of bony lesions will be given in detail.
The option and necessity for a specialist second opinion is emphasized.
During routine middle ear surgery prototypes of implantable piezoelectric hearing aid transducers were coupled to the ossicular chain of 28 patients.
Pure tone thresholds in a broad frequency range (250 Hz-8 kHz) and perception of music were the basis of psychoacoustic evaluation of the transfer properties of the prototypes in this human study.
The piezoelectric transducer reached an equivalent transducer sound-pressure level of up to 145 dB SPL and frequencies of 10 kHz.
The dynamics for music reached 32 dB, which was identical with the results of the preoperative investigations using hi-fi headsets (33 dB).
The low nonlinear distortions of around 0.1% and the frequency range up to 10 kHz are reflected in the positive evaluation of sound quality by 84% of the patients involved.
The study is the basis for realizing a piezoelectric transducer designed for routine clinical implantations.
The transducer is thought to be part of a totally implantable future hearing aid for rehabilitation of moderate and severe sensory neural hearing loss predominantly in the middle and high frequency range.
Background: Baker et al.
used a CO2 laser for blepharoplasty for the first time.
The ultrapulse CO2 laser provides a sophisticated instrument that makes more application alternatives possible in ophthalmology.
Several investigations prove that monaural acoustic deprivation induces detrimental changes in the auditory pathway.
So far the major interest focused on degenerative processes on the deprived side, while effects on the contralateral untreated side were not taken into consideration.
This ontogenetic study investigates effects of early monaural acoustic deprivation on the functional development of the acoustically evoked auditory brainstem response (ABR) in the Mongolian gerbil.
Young gerbils were deafened by a single intracochlear application of neomycin sulfate.
The ABR development on the contralateral side differed in a late developmental period from that of normally hearing animals.
These changes persisted until adulthood.
Between day 55 and day 90 a significant 5 dB decrease of the ABR thresholds and a significant shortening of the interpeak latency II-V occured.
The results confirm that a complete monaural deprivation during the sensible or critical period leads on the contralateral side to plastic or compensatory changes in the auditory brainstem.
There are estimated to be 20 million people blinded by cataracts, 80-90 % of whom live in rural areas of developing countries where expert surgical resources are scarce.
The majority of all cataract operations are still intracapsular extractions (ICCE).
Aphakic correction using spectacles is problematical in developing countries.
This study was undertaken to evaluate the safety of multiflex open loop anterior chamber intraocular lenses (AC IOLs).
Dorsal fusion with the internal fixator has become the standard treatment of instabilities and deformities of the thoracolumbar spine.
With our new device, the modular spine fixator (MSF), which has been specially designed for short-distance instrumentations, we have increasingly been treating unstable injuries of the thoracolumbar spine by one-level stabilization.
Prerequisite is an accurate evaluation of the indication, including CT and MRI to assess the involvement of the intervertebral disc and the ligamental structures.
The operative technique differs in some details from the procedure in moremulti-level instrumentations, especially concerning the application of the pedicle screws.
The instrumentation is always combined with posterior allogenic bone grafting.
Since the beginning of 1993 we also perform anterior autogenic transpedicular bone grafting.
Between Januar 1991 and July 1995, 57 one-level stabilizations with the MSF were performed.
Of the 57 patients operated on 39, 27 men and 12 women, with an average age of 41 years, have had a clinical and radiographic follow-up examination so far, on average, 27 months after the accident.
Seventeen patients were completely free of pain and 17 patients (were only) sensivite to weather changes or had minor pain during great physical stress.
Five patients had pain even during slight physical stress or at rest.
The preoperatively measured Cobb angle was 15.1  ° on average, after the operation 5.2  °, and at the time of the follow-up examination amounted to 8.1  °.
The patients' range of motion was normal.
Only five minor complications have been seen.
No implant fatigue failure has been noted in this series.
We derive from these results that, for correct indications, one-level stabilization can be performed successfully and should be firmly established in the operative treatment of unstable fractures of the thoracolumbar spine.
Between May 1995 and March 1996 we were able to diagnose and remove glomus tumors of the left nasal cavity from three female patients.
Ages of the patients were 9, 36 and 74 years.
All patients suffered from a frequent epistaxis and all were extremely sensitive to the slightest nasal touch.
One patient reported breathing difficulties due to nasal congestion.
Examination revealed a tumor that filled the entire nasal cavity.
The method of choice in treatment of these tumors is surgical removal.
Hemangiopericytoma, non-chromaffin paraganglioma,  hidradenoma, cavernous hemangioma and nevus cell nevi have to be excluded by histology and immunohistochemical techniques.
From a clinical perspective the bleeding  septal polyp (granuloma telangiectaticum sive pyogenicum sive pediculatum) has to be considered because it often comes from Kieselbachi's plexus, has a mushroom-like appearance and bleeds slightly.
Background: Gynaecological surgery including laparoscopy is frequently associated with PONV.
Therefore, choosing an anaesthetic with only little side effects in operations eligible for outpatient surgery is at least as important as applying anaesthetics that enable fast-tracking.
The reliability of continuous fibreoptic oximetry in cerebral venous blood and its correlation with intracranial and cerebral perfusion pressures (pressure-volume curve) were examined in an experimental porcine study.
In a population-based study of 110 women between 53 and 82 years of age (mean age 64.5 +/- 7.9 years) static posturography data were compared to functional items of gait and balance in common geriatric mobility scales.
Posturographic data of double-stance with eyes open and eyes closed (DSEO; DSEC) did not differ from those of a group of healthy women previously tested for intact nervous system function.
The total neuromuscular score - roughly corresponding to the well-known Tinetti score - did not correlate to the posturographic measures.
DSEC correlated with the items "rapid walking" and "single-stance left leg".
Age, vision, and neuropsychologic test results correlated with DSEO, "rapid walking", "single-stance right leg", "single-stance left leg", and "walking a figure eight".
Multiple linear regression confirmed the impact of age, vision, DSEO, and DSEC on "rapid walking" with a 34% variance explanation.
Posturographic parameters did predict other selected gait and balance items.
When used in older women living independently in the community, parameters of static posturography reflect to some extent the functional disabilities of gait and balance.
The ocular surface epithelia with the tear film as a unit provide clear vision and comfort and serve as the first line of defense.
It is important to understand how ocular surface health is maintained and how ocular surface failure occurs.
Furthermore, it is timely to summarize new information concerning action mechanisms and clinical uses of amniotic membrane transplantation for ocular surface reconstruction.
When appropriately processed and preserved, amniotic membrane as a native matrix can be used as a graft to restore conjunctival surfaces following removal of lesions such as pterygium, tumor, scar, symblepharon, and conjunctivochalasis.
It can also be used as a graft to restore corneal surfaces suffering from limbal stem-cell deficiency.
For partial limbal deficiency, amniotic membrane alone is frequently sufficient, while for total limbal deficiency it needs to be combined with limbal stem-cell transplantation with or without corneal transplantation.
When used as a graft or patch, amniotic membrane can facilitate healing of persistent corneal ulcers and recurrent corneal erosion and reduce corneal haze following keratectomy.
Reported data indicate that amniotic membrane transplantation facilitates rapid healing with recovery of a normal epithelial phenotype in the epithelium and reduces inflammation, vascularization, and scarring in the stroma.
Purpose: Evalution of MRI in radiotherapy of humeroscapular periarthritis.
Background: Presentation of current data and knowledge in the field of experimental and clinical neuroendocrinology.
According to the recommendations of the German Ophthalmological Sociaty (DOG), PRK in myopic patients between -1.0 dpt and -6.0 dpt is a scientific acknowled treatment.
The risks of the treatment, however, increase in myopia above -6.0 dpt.
Introduction: Improved socio-economic conditions have led to an increase of adult height during the last century.
If excessive height is regarded as a serious psychological handicap, final height can be reduced by early and high doses treatment with sexual steroids.
This therapy influences pubertal development and growth of healthy adolescents.
For that reason patients should be carefully selected, taking into account the benefits and possible side effects.
Colour measurements were performed on powdery substances of whitish to slightly yellow colouring (cocaine samples of different composition) in order to give an unequivocal optical description of the samples and relate them to control samples.
The measurements were carried out with a spectrophotometer (Carl-Zeiss-Jena GmbH, MCS 400) using a halogen bulb as light source (standard illuminant D65).
Colorimetric classification was made on the basis of the CIE-L*a*b*-values.
The examination showed that specimens of similar or different chemical composition which could not be distinguished macroscopically revealed characteristic differences in the CIE-L*a*b*-measures.
The method gives a first clue for orientation within a few minutes when comparing substances in specimens of different origin.
Eighty-five patients with grade 2 or grade 3 sprains of the acromioclavicular (AC) joint were evaluated clinically and radiographically 32 months after injury.
Group I included 34 patients with grade 2 sprains (Tossy II) and group II included 51 patients with grade 3 injuries (Tossy III).
In group I, 15 patients were treated surgically (group I a) and 19 patients were treated conservatively (group I b), while in group II, 41 patients were treated surgically (group II a) and 10 patients were treated conservatively (group II b).
At surgery open reduction and transarticular fixation of the AC joint with Kirschner wires was performed.
Conservative treatment included the initial use of a sling or a knapsack bandage and early performance of range-of-motion exercises.
Shoulder function was assessed according to the score devised by Constant and Murley.
In both groups, 97 of 100 possible points (minimum 72, maximum 100) were obtained after conservative and after surgical treatment.
Nine of 10 patients (90%) with grade 3 sprains (group IIb) had more pronounced displacement and increased mobility of the lateral end of the clavicle after conservating treatment.
After surgery, dislocation and increased horizontal, mobility of the lateral end of the clavicle occurred in 18 (44%) of 41 patients with grade 3 sprains (group II a P<0.0001).
However, these findings did not correlate with the functional outcome.
At follow-up there was a significant increase in degenerative changes seen on radio-graphs (P<0.035) in all patients.
Again these findings did not correlate with the functional outcome.
More degenerative radiological changes were observed in patients who had undergone surgery (P<0.003).
Patients with grade 2 sprains were more frequently restricted in sporting activity after surgery (P<0.05).
Patients with grade 3 sprains who were treated surgically complained of pain more frequently (P<0.01), and they returned to work later than patients who were treated conservatively after grade 3 sprains.
An additional rehabilitation program guided by a physiotherapist seemed to have no impact on the functional outcome.
A total of 56 patients were treated by surgery.
Among these patients 11 complications occurred, requiring five additional surgical procedures.
Among 29 conservatively treated patients, only in 1 patient did subacromially located arthritic changes of the AC joint have to be removed.
Macular amyloidosis (MA) and lichen amyloidosus (LA) are the two major variants of the primary cutaneous amyloidoses which present with severe and therapy resistent itching.
Various therapeutic modalities such as antihistamines, intralesional injection or topical application of corticosteroids, etretinate, UVB irradiation and dermoabrasion have been employed with variable success.
Recently, in a few case reports authors have observed encouraging beneficial clinical effects by using topical dimethyl sulphoxide (DMSO).
In our study 10 patients with either MA or LA or biphasic amyloidosis were treated with a 50% solution of DMSO in water.
9 of them showed marked clinical improvement at the end of 6-20 weeks of treatment.
Degranulation and depletion of the mast cells by DMSO is the most probable explanation for the rapid improvement of itching beginning within the first week of therapy.
Remarkable flattening of the lichenoid papules which was obtained within 11 weeks of treatment is interpreted as a result of the improvement of itching and the related scratch effect.
Histological examination after treatment revealed no disappearance of amyloid deposits in the papillary dermis.
In the follow-up period relapses of itching and papules were observed.
Therefore further studies are needed to find out the optimal procedure of therapy.
As early as 1974, Brian advocated the prone position for ventilated patients [5].
He suggested that this position might enhance ventilation of the dorsal parts of the lungs, thereby improving oxygenation.
These considerations have been confirmed by several experimental and clinical studies [1, 6, 13, 17].
Better secretion removal, decreased intrapulmonary shunting, and an increased FRC are thought to be responsible for the observed improvement of oxygenation.
However, the prone position never became very popular in the clinical treatment of the adult respiratory distress syndrome (ARDS).
Routine performance of thoracic CT scans in ARDS patients demonstrated preferential distribution of pathological densities in the dependent lung areas.
The prone position therefore could possibly benefit these patients, as shown by two recent studies [8, 11].
The aim of our study was to evaluate the influence of repeatedly turning the patient to the prone position on gas exchange and thoracic CT findings in multiple-trauma patients.
Seven ventilated intensive care patients with severe ARDS (Murray Score >2.5 [9], Quotient >0.7 [4], mean airway pressure >18 cm H2O, thoracic CT scan showing dorsal atelectases) were included in the study.
Patients were turned from the supine to the prone position at 12-h intervals using an air-cushion bed (Mediscus, Austria).
Redistribution of dystelectatic or atelectatic dependent lung areas was verified by means of repeated thoracic CT scans (Figs.
The patients were intermittently turned for 6.5  +/-  1.1 days.
The course of gas exchange is shown in Figs.
Initially, improvement of the respiratory quotient could only be achieved during prone positioning, from the 2nd day in the supine position as well.
Intrapulmonary shunting showed a similar trend (Figs.
No significant changes in cardiovascular parameters could be observed.
Control thoracic CT scans showed uniform reduction of atelectases in dependent lung areas (Figs.
The inspiratory fraction of oxygen could be reduced significantly as of the 2nd day (Fig.
Constant levels of positive end-expiratory pressure and tidal volume were associated with decreasing mean and plateau airway pressures (Fig.
Repeatedly turning the patient to the prone position produced long-lasting improvement of arterial oxygenation, which persists up to the end of the weaning process.
This is in good accordance with other studies [1, 2, 6, 8, 11, 13, 17], however, this is the first study to report an observation period of more than 6 days of repeatedly turning the patient.
These positive effects on gas exchange can be attributed to sudden improvement of the ventilation-perfusion ratio within the lung areas that become dependent after turning to the prone position.
Due to reduced hydrostatic pressure [11] and relative hyperventilation [7, 16], previously collapsed alveoli are recruited in the lung areas that become non-dependent after turning to the prone position.
After a gynecological operation under therapy with unfractionated and low molecular weight heparin, a 63 year old patient developed right-sided ascending pelvic thrombosis with multiple pulmonary embolism and infarction pneumonia, septic-toxic circulatory failure, and thrombocytopenia.
Heparin-associated thrombocytopenia (HAT) type II was diagnosed.
Because of contraindications against thrombolysis a cava-filter was implanted, heparin therapy was stopped, and anticoagulation with recombinant hirudin was started.
Inspite of this, an arterial thrombosis of the A. femoralis superficialis developed and had to be treated surgically.
From this time on, no further thromboembolic complications were noticed.
Overlapping coumarin therapy was begun.
Due to ubiquitous coumarin-necrosis, rapid progressive toxic circulatory failure with disseminated intravascular coagulation (DIC) developed two days after terminating hirudin therapy necessitating high dose catecholamine therapy.
A second course of hirudin resulted in complete restitution of the coumarin-necrosis without the need for re-operation.
Subsequent coumarin-therapy, which was gradually increased over two weeks, was without further complications.
Thus, hirudin appears to be a new and safe alternative to a therapy with the heparinoid danaparoid in HAT type II with fulminant thromboembolic complications and especially in coumarin-necrosis with critical septic-toxic circulatory failure and DIC.
A prospective process-analysis evaluating organizational, medical and medical-technical alterations and real-time-documentation during out-of-hospital resuscitations (n=71) was performed due to the definitions of the "Utstein-Style".
The gaseous radical nitric oxide (NO) is catalyzed by conversion of L-arginine to L-citrulline by one cytokine inducible form (iNOS), which becomes active only within hours after the inducing event, and by two constitutively expressed forms, endothelial (eNOS) and neuronal (nNOS), which are regulated by the cytosolic concentration of free Ca2+.
Brain nNOS is physiologically present in discrete populations of neurons, which are all excited by glutamate via the ionotropic N-methyl-D-aspartate (NMDA) receptor, which controls a Ca2+ channel.
After its diffusion into the extraneuronal space, NO may activate in neurons, which as a rule do not stain for NOS, soluble guanylyl cyclase and formation of cGMP as an intracellular messenger.
Beyond that, NO is important as a feedback regulator of glutamatergic excitation.
NO as a nitrosylating agent enhances disulfide bonding of vicinal sulfhydryl (thiol) groups of the redox modulatory site of the NMDA receptor complex and thereby down-regulates its Ca2+ channel activity.
Histochemically studies have revealed the presence of large number of NOS containing neurons in the magnocellular and parvocellular subdivisions of hypothalamic nuclei.
Numerous studies conform to the view that NO participates in the control of many different neurosecretory processes, especially of the corticotropin-releasing hormone (CRH) neurosecretory system.
The redox-modulatory site of the NMDA receptor appears, therefore, as a critical structure in the control of the hypothalamic-pituitary-adrenocortical (HPA) axis.
Moreover, glucocorticoids augment neuronal excitotoxicity by increasing the expression of glutamate receptors and inhibition of glutamate reuptake.
In attempting to explain the many conflicting results obtained in studies with NO, it may be worthwhile to consider that the actual redox-environment of distinct loci of the brain may determine the final function of NO, acting either as a transmitter or neuromodulator or, in the worst case, causing neurodestruction.
It seems likely that any kind of stress by altering the ratio of reduced vs oxidized thiols within the central nervous system influences neuronal excitability, with NO working either as an amplifier or as a feedback regulator of neuronal excitation or inhibition, which may alter acutely or chronically, among others, the homeostasis of a given neurosecretory system.
Purpose: To study early and late findings of macular retinal thickness in patients with hypotony following filtering procedures.
Even in the era of coronary stenting, acute coronary artery occlusion continues to represent a significant limitation of percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty (PTCA).
Despite application of heparin and aspirin, abrupt vessel closure still occurs in 2-8%, depending on the definition applied.
Especially patients receiving PTCA for acute coronary syndromes are at high risk for abrupt vessel closure.
The formation of an intracoronary thrombus plays a central role in the pathogenesis of abrupt vessel closure.
Dipyridamole induces dilatation of coronary arteries and prevents platelet aggregation by a mechanism that differs from that of aspirin.
The primary purpose of the study was to evaluate whether adjunctive local intracoronary therapy with dipyridamole could reduce the incidence of coronary artery occlusion following PTCA.
Secondary endpoints were defined as myocardial infarction, necessity for bypass grafting, and death.
The intravesical instillation of BCG (Bacillus Calmette-Guérin) in cases of relapsed superficial bladder cancer is an acknowledged kind of prophylaxis.
It is uncertainly up to now whether a verification of the immune systems competence is necessary.
The recommendations in this problem are very different.
In conclusion to the recent literature we think that a verification of the immune system before BCG installation in the urinary bladder has not a prognostic value.
Additionally, the legal obligingness of this immunotest is doubtful.
Discoid meniscus is one of the commonest anatomical variations of the meniscus.
There is at the moment no consensus on the aetiology of discoid meniscus.
According to Watanabe three types can be differentiated: the complete form, the incomplete form and the hypermobile Wrisberg form.
Discoid meniscus frequently remains asymptomatic and thus requires no treatment.
Partial meniscectomy is recommended for treatment of the stable form, while for the unstable forms total meniscectomy is generally regarded as the treatment of choice, since the instability means that rupture of residual meniscus would be possible.
A fourteen years old girl showed the classic signs of acrocephalosyndactyly I: dysostosis craniofacialis with hypertelorism, exophthalmus, strabism, amblyopia and cleft palate as well as syndactyly of the fingers and toes.
The feet showed on both side a 6  cm long horny band.
Since the twelfth year of life, she had suffered from papulo-pustular acne with many comedomes.
Her menstruation started one year later.
At time of her birth, her father was 54 years old, and her mother 36 years old.
Two elder siblings are healthy.
The inheritance of acrocephalosyndactyly I is usually autosomal dominant, but sporadic cases are frequent.
Objective: Cognitive dysfunction is a known problem after operations and may be especially relevant in the elderly.
The aim of this international multicentre study was to investigate short- and long-term cognitive dysfunction in elderly patients and to elucidate the relevance of hypoxaemia and hypotension as causative factors.
Autosomal recessive inheritance, intrauterine growth retardation, short stature, microcephaly, distinct facial dysmorphism, psychomotoric retardation, and often uncharacterized eczematous skin lesions distinguish the rare Dubowitz syndrome.
Here a pair of monozygotic twins with Dubowitz syndrome and clear-cut atopic eczema is presented.
Humeral shaft fractures can be treated either conservatively or operatively.
Plating of the humerus is the established operative method, but recently interest has also been focussed on intramedullary nailing.
Fifty-nine cases of humeral fractures treated with intramedullary nailing (Seidel/Marchetti-Vicenzi/Prévot) from January 1991 to December 1995 (44 fractures after trauma, 11 pathological fractures, 3 pseudarthroses, 1 re-fracture).
Closed reduction in 55/59 cases.
One infection (soft tissue); 2/48 pseudarthrosis (indication for nailing: pseudarthrosis!).
No iatrogenic palsy of the radial nerve.
Functional postoperative treatment in all 44 cases of humeral fractures after adequate trauma.
One poor functional result: periarticular ossification after retrograde nailing, possibly connected with long-term respiratory treatment after trauma.
Treatment of humeral shaft fractures by intramedullary nailing is favoured in our clinic (low complication rates, excellent or good functional results, limited approaches, small scars).
Proximal fractures should be treated by the Seidel nail (stable interlocking of the proximal fragment); very distal fractures need Prévot nailing (reaming of condylar canals).
All other fractures of the humeral shaft can be treated by each of the implants used in our clinic.
Pathological fractures are an excellent indication for intramedullary stabilization.
These patients benefit from stable fixation without intense surgical trauma.
Pseudarthrosis, according to our limited experience, seems to require plating plus bone grafting.
Plating is also recommended if revision of the radial nerve becomes necessary.
2-4 % of vascular injuries need operative reconstruktion.
In polytraumatized patients the rate is even 10 %.
Arterial vascular repair should precede venous reconstruction and orthopaedic stabilization due to limb threatening ischemia.
Penetration or blunt vascular trauma result either in acute blood loss, ischemia or compartmental compression.
Reperfusion syndrom leads to vital threat of patient.
Clinical assessment, measurement of limb pressures using a Doppler device and use of duplex ultrasonography are reliable adjuncts in the rapid evaluation.
Arteriography is rarely indicated and should be spared for patients with abnormal physical examination.
Minimizing ischemia (6-8 h) is an important factor in maximizing limb salvage.
Vascular repair include direct anastomosis or lateral suture repair mostly combined with primary shortening of the extremity.
In most cases autogenous vein graft is required.
Rethrombosis, arteriovenous fistula and pseudoaneurysms are possible complications.
Stabilisation of the fracture has priority over vascular reconstruction.
The initial steps to success are surgical debridement, adequate bony stabilization mostly by external fixation, revascularisation of vascular injury, immediate fascial decompression and early soft-tissue reconstruction.
The best results are obtained when a multidiciplinary approach is used combining expertise in orthopedic surgery, vascular surgery and plastic surgery.
In secondary prevention, statins are cost-effective and even more cost-effective than other lipid lowering drugs.
Statins are especially favorable in patients with previous myocardial infarction compared to those with angina pectoris.
For secondary prevention of coronary heart disease, statins should be administered generously.
In primary prevention, statins are effective but not cost-efficient.
Unfavorable results have to be expected especially in premenopausal women, younger patients, and in those with a low risk factor profile.
For population based primary prevention, only dietary measures can be advocated; however, apart from a serious lack of compliance their efficiency has not yet been proven.
Preventive measures have their own prize; in general they are considered not to prevent coronary heart disease but retard it.
Therefore, such therapeutic interventions can be assumed not to reduce but rather to increase the "direct" medical costs.
Furthermore, successful prevention of coronary heart disease leads, due to life-prolongation, to an increase in people out of work and in disabled patients due to age and/or disease.
Therefore, an increase especially of the "indirect" costs for unemployment, pension, nursing homes, etc.
Background: There are three fields where the the biochemical cardiac markers creatine kinase (CK), its isoenzyme MB (CK-MB), myoglobin, and troponin can play an important role: (1) the primary diagnosis of acute myocardial infarction (AMI), (2) identification of patients suffering from unstable angina with minor myocardial damage (MMD) and consecutively increased risk for major cardiovascular events, and (3) assessment of coronary reperfusion after intravenous thrombolysis.
MRSA/MRSE infections are a major problem in hospitals and although in orthopaedic units the incidence is low awareness of this problem is necessary.
Once a MRSA strain has been isolated the strict use of the hygiene precautions has to be applied to avoid epidemic spread of the strain.
The patient has to be isolated.
The staff has to use gloves and gowns whilst treating the patient.
A antimicrobiel hand wash solution has to be used after taking off the gloves and before leaving the isolation room.
Patient and staff have to be informed about the pathogenity and the way of infection spread so that infection precaution rules are fulfilled.
Antibiotics should only be used in clinically well defined cases and the overall use of antibiotics should be reduced to lower the incidence of MRSA/E isolates.
The problems of an MRSA case and its successful treatment are demonstrated.
A microphone constructed for implantation in the posterior wall of the auditory canal and a piezoelectric transducer serving as the main components of an implantable hearing aid were temporally implanted in five patients during middle ear surgery under local anesthesia.
The microphone was positioned beneath the skin of the auditory canal such that it completely covered the microphone membrane.
The vibratory element of the transducer was coupled to the malleus in four patients with normal ossicular chains and directly to the stapes in one patient with missing incus.
The microphone and transducer were electrically connected with an external battery-driven signal amplifier.
Speech material and music were presented in the operation room at a sound level of 65 dB SPL under free-field conditions.
The patients had to estimate the quality of speech, music, and their own voice as well as the effects of bone-conducting noises.
All patients were able to hear with the system.
An intraoperative talk without vision contact was possible without any problems, as was understanding of numerals ("Freiburger Zahlentest").
Perception of music was judged as "clear and undistorted with all broadband component."
The estimation was also valid for one patient with a sensorineural hearing loss.
One patient declared the music to be "a little of unnatural."
Bone-conducted sound was estimated as normal in two patients, better than without an implant in one patient with sensorineural hearing loss, and "somewhat metallic" in another patient.
Hearing the own voice was considered "normal" in two cases "monotonous" in one case, and "a little bit roaring" in another case.
An amplification factor that can be technically realized in an implantable hearing aid was necessary for one of the patients with sensorineural hearing loss to perceive music at a pleasant volume.
On the basis of this study, essential requirements for the construction of a fully implantable hearing aid are fulfilled.
We report a patient with metachromatic leukodystrophy (MLD) with a first manifestation of homicide.
On admission the patient showed a hebephrenia-like syndrom with inappropriate affect, thought disorder and  behavioral changes.
Magnetic resonance  tomography (MRT) findings suggested a  diagnosis of MLD, which was confirmed by a decreased activity of leucocyte arylsulfatase A and an excessive urinary sulfatide excretion.
The cervical spondylotic myelopathy is the most frequent spinal dysfunction.
Its spontaneous course is very variable, from progress to stagnation.
This makes prognosis and decision-making difficult for conservative or operative treatment.
The authors attempt to provide some basis for decision-making by observing the individual course of neural dysfunction, consideration of morphometric data and the use of functional scores.
To advise a patient, the outcome of conservative and operative treatment as described in the literature has to be considered, as well as the possible complications.
The advantages and disadvantages of surgery from the anterior and posterior approach are discussed.
Operative planning according to the individual condition is suggested.
Operative techniques of anterior decompression and fusion are contrasted to laminoplasties.
Subject: In a 7;11 year old boy with trichotillomania (ICD-10 F63.3), attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) (ICD-10 F90.1), and subclinical minimal cerebral dysfunction, Methylphenidate (Ritalin) medication resulted in a remarkable improvement: unexspected interruption of trichotillomania with regrowth of hair.
An essential feature of the known procedures for the analysis of the ECG signal is the splitting of the ECG into individual parameters which are subsequently processed in defined decision trees, neuronal networks or statistical procedures to diagnostic information.
The correctness of the diagnostic statements thus substantially depends on the suitable selection and the exact determination of the individual criteria.
The analysis algorithm and the expert knowledge are closely linked due to the procedure.
This paper presents a new procedure or the evaluation of signals of medical sensor systems by the example of the ECG.
Unlike the methods used up to now, this procedure is not based on an ever more profound splitting of the ECG signal into individual features.
Furthermore, analysis algorithm and knowledge base are separated from each other.
The consideration underlying the procedure is that two ECGs whose leads show identical or very similar signal patterns indicate identical or at least very similar cardiological diagnoses.
As this assumption is the basis of medical experience, it should be possible to compare the signal patterns of the leads of an unknown ECG with those of the leads of the reference ECGs from a database and to draw conclusions for the diagnosis of the unknown ECG.
For this purpose, those ECGs are searched in an ECG database whose leads show greatest agreement with the signal pattern of the unknown ECG.
The function of the method was established with the aid of the ECG signal database CARDIODAT with 249 ECGs for the diagnostic groups: infarcts and healthy reference persons from a data inventory of 550 ECGs.
It can be seen from the results that the presented procedure which is based on signal pattern recognition is a new approach to deriving diagnostic information from the ECG signal at least for the diagnostic group of myocardial infarcts.
Purpose: The technical conditions, the optimized scanning protocols and the facilities of virtual endoscopy (VE) are presented in an overview.
During a 4-week ambulatory cardiacc rehabilitation program, 262 patients with coronary artery disease (CAD), 235 men and 27 women, 53.6+/-10.2 years, performed 30.5+/-2,9 exercise units.
Before and after the rehabilitation program exercise, capacity was assessed by bicycle ergometry.
There was a significant (p<0.001) increase in the maximum exercise capacity at the end of the program (105.3+/-32.3 vs. 121.9+/-37.3 W).
Physical work capacity on the 2.0 mmol lactate level improved (p<0.001) from 72.2+/-23.5 to 86.4+/-25.8 W, on the 2.5 mmol/l level (p<0.001) from 83.5+/-23.2 to 97.4+/-26.4 W, and on the 3.0 mmol/l level (p<0.001) from 93.1+/-23.0 to 106.6+/-26.1 W. Despite enhanced performance, heart rate remained unaltered on the 2.0, 2.5, and 3.0 mmol/l lactate level.
Furthermore, ergometric performance on predefined heart rate levels was significantly (p<0.001) increased: 85/min: from 56.0+/-24.1 to 65.8+/-24.5 W; 90/min: from 62.0+/-27.3 to 71.2+/-26 W; 95/min: from 67.2+/-26.4 to 77.5+/-27.6 W; 100/min: from 71.1+/-29.6 to 80.6+/-28.1 W; 105/min: from 69.8+/-26.2 to 81.9+/-28.2 W and 110/min: from 73.6+/-28.9 to 90.4+/-29.4 W. The results demonstrate that physical performance in patients with CAD was improved by our novel ambulatory cardiac rehabilitation program.
This improvement included an increase in maximum as well as endurance work capacity; furthermore, this increase was accompanied by a decrease in resting and exercise heart rates.
The results demonstrate an absolute increase of physical performance, more importantly an increase of physical performance at defined lactate levels in the presence of unchanged heart rates mediated by the rehabilitation program.
Thus, this increase was independent of motivational factors in the patients and/or the investigators during the re-exercise test.
On the contrary, our data demonstrate that it is based on an improvement of aerobic endurance capacity associated with a therapeutically beneficial significant decrease of heart rate for a defined workload.
The effects were independent of pharmacological influences (e.g., -receptor antagonists).
These findings are of clinical importance with respect to reduction of myocardial oxygen consumption in patients with CAD.
Newborn screening programs for inborn errors of metabolism are well established in industrialized countries.
Missed cases may be not only due to errors in specimen collection and laboratory errors but also to failures in adequate follow up.
We report the case of a now 4-year-old girl whose classical phenylketonuria was diagnostically missed in the course of follow-up procedures of a pathological screening result 1067 µmol/l 17,6 mg% phenylalanine.
The separation of whole blood into components is the state-of-the-art in transfusion of allogeneic blood.
The main reasons are the negative effects of the buffy coat and the need for FFP.
Nevertheless, especially in Germany whole blood is being rejected more and more even as autologous blood.
However, most of the negative effects of the buffy coat do not apply to autologous blood.
Additionally, these patients usually do not develop coagulation disorders and therefore do not need plasma as a hemostatic component.
On the other hand, separation into components of autologous blood leads to an increase of costs and to logistic problems that restrict autologous blood predeposit to a few institutions.
Therefore, we have reviewed the literature in order to find a scientific basis for this.
We analysed all articles listed by MEDLINE during the last 12 years that dealt with the quality of whole blood or red cell concentrates.
In addition, all references were included that contributed relevant information to the topic.
A total of 135 original articles, abstracts, reviews, letters or editorials were analysed that referred to standard preparations and storage media.
In 48 papers the in vivo red cell survival was studied.
28 of which fulfilled the prerequisites to be included into a meta-analysis.
The following in vitro parameters were also evaluated: pH, potassium load of the units, ATP and DPG concentration of the red cells.
Whole blood (resuspended in CPDA-1) and red cell units (stabilized in CPDA-1 or additive solutions) with a different buffy coat or leucocyte content have comparable pH values and red cell 2,3-DPG and ATP concentrations at the end of the approved storage time.
The potassium load of a whole blood unit appears to be higher than red cell concentrates, but this is to some extent caused by the higher plasma content of whole blood and is not thought to be a clinically relevant problem for patients receiving only a few units.
A number of studies demonstrate that dependent upon the leucocyte content of a red cell unit, leucocyte metabolites and enzymes are released and accumulate during storage.
A detrimental influence on the integrity of the red cell membrane was found in several in vitro studies.
Nevertheless, a significant improvement in red cell survival by leucocyte reduction was detected by only one group.
Undoubtedly, non-hemolytic febrile transfusion reactions (NHFTR) are generally caused by an antibody-antigen interaction due to the transfusion of allogeneic buffy coat.
On the other hand, there is some evidence that non-specific immunological mechanisms such as the release of histamine or cytokines are also capable of causing NHFTR.
Thus, these reactions are expected to occur in autologous blood transfusion.
However, so far, there are no data about the frequency and severity of these reactions and whether they are more likely to emerge after transfusion of blood units with a particular preparation.
Blood transfusions can cause septic complications due to bacterial contamination of the transfused units.
These fatal but rare complications may be reduced by pre-storage filtration of blood, but there is no indication that buffy coat reduction is effective.
Three cases with septic complications have been reported after autologous transfusion, in two of which red cell concentrates (at least one was free of buffy coat) had been used.
Thus, there is no justification for the conclusion that the risk of septic complications is increased by transfusion of whole blood.
After all, whole blood and red cell concentrates exhibit only minor differences in relevant in vitro parameters.
Hence, a higher incidence of adverse effects following the transfusion of autologous whole blood compared to autologous red cell concentrations is unlikely.
Therefore, the 24 h in vivo recovery is considered to be the most valid criterion to assess the quality of red cell preparations.
Physical therapy can support geriatric rehabilitation in contributing to better health status, mobility, and quality of life.
However, the central focus of this contribution is not on illness-specific aspects of physical therapy but on power and stamina training.
These two training methods are of special importance for geriatric rehabilitation since most patients are admitted due to related problems and these two methods do imply specific risk factors for the rehabilitation process.
The spectrum of physical adaptation processes supported by power and stamina training is described and scientifically evaluated.
Even in higher age groups positive training effects are possible.
Adequate usage of these training methods contributes to increased competence and a minimization of risks in daily life.
The arthroscopic extraarticular Bankart procedure tries to imitate the open Bankart procedure.
An anterior-inferior transmuscular approach through the subscapular muscle permits to implant self-locking tacks into the anterior inferior third of the glenoid rim.
The extraarticular location of the implants makes a superomedial capsular shift possible, if required.
A total of 257 arthroscopic repairs following traumatic recurrent anterior shoulder dislocation have been carried out between 1992 and 1996.
177 patients were treated only with bioabsorbable Suretac device.
Clinical and radiological follow up was possible in 165 patients.
According to the Rowe score 69,7 % were classified as excellent, 10,9 % as good, 9,7 % fair and 9,7 % poor.
Postoperative complications: the recurrence rate was 9,7 %, allergic reactions representing a foreign body reaction to the synthetic material were seen in 5 cases (3 %) and a frozen shoulder in 6 cases 3,6 %).
61 % of the patients involved in overhead or contact sports returned to their preoperative sport activities.
Contrast-enhanced 3D MR angiography permits comprehensive assessment of the arterial system in the chest, abdomen und lower extremities.
The method combines intravenous bolus application of a non-nephrotoxic, paramagnetic, extracellular contrast agent with the acquisition of a fast 3D data set.
High contrast between the vascular lumen and surrounding tissues, inherent three-dimensionality and the ability to collect image data in the chest and abdomen under apnea conditions all contribute to excellent image quality.
Contrast-enhanced 3D MRA is being employed in many centers throughout the world for the evaluation of various arterial pathologies.
This review provides a technical overview and critically discusses the clinical applications in the chest, abdomen and lower extremities based upon the available literature and several clincial examples.
The indications for magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) on prosthetic heart valve recipients remain critical.
A generalized contraindication for MRI is doubtful.
Some diagnostic questions such as interests in pathologies of the posterior cranial fossa, spinal abscesses, and internal derangements for the knee, strongly recommend the advantages of MRI versus all other radiological diagnostic techniques.
MRI can directly affect patients with prosthetic valves in three ways by: 1) movement or dislodgment of the prosthesis, 2) heating, and 3) arrhythmias induced by electric currents, and indirectly by distortion of the image and its subsequent misinterpretation.
Present literature that concerns the safety considerations of current values appears to be incomplete.
Therefore, a survey of twenty-five valve manufacturers with regard to compatibility, safety or contraindication for MRI on their respective prosthetic heart valves was performed in 1998.
Those manufacturers who distribute most of the valves in Europe confirmed the safety of MRI.
However, some gave their assurances based on inadequate data, or assigned all responsibility to the physician.
Some companies did not give any assurance for MRI safety or failed to respond to our enquiry.
Two valve manufacturers warned against performing MRI on certain prostheses.
Based on our 1998 questionnaire, the technical issues, the clinical circumstances, the prerequisites and criteria for and the definition of safety standards for MRI on prosthetic heart valve recipients are presented in this paper.
Argyrophilic grain disease (AGD) is a frequently occurring degenerative illness of the aging human brain.
It is accompanied by progressive pathological alterations of the cytsokeleton which are traceable to an abnormal phosphorylation of the microtubule associated tau protein.
Histologically, it is possible with the help of suitable staining techniques to identify pathognomonic spindle-shaped cellular inclusions (argyrophilic grains).
These cellular inclusions display a typical cortical as well as subcortical distribution pattern.
The goal of the present study is the retrospective evaluation of the clinical findings from 53 individuals with neuropathologically demonstrable AGD-related changes of the brain.
Nearly one-half of the cases (49%) was classifiable as demented in accordance with DSM IV-criteria.
Moreover, the frequency of the dementia increased significantly in relation to the growing severity of the AGD-associated pathological cytoskeletal degeneration.
These results confirm the assumption that AGD can cause degenerative changes ranging from cognitive impairment all the way to dementia.
They also underscore the necessity of further prospective studies pertaining to the clinical aspects of this still enigmatic disease.
The major problems in the treatment of open fractures with high blood loss are hypothermia acidosis and coagulopathy.
By improving the standards of polytrauma management and using massive transfusion systems, which should help to avoid those complications, the indication for primary limb salvage under hypovolemic shock conditions is greatly increased.
The following case of an grade 3 open fracture of the femur with severe soft-tissue damage, including vascular lesions, with consecutive massive transfusion, should demonstrate that the cardiac-respiratory system can still be stabilized, even if a surgical solution seems impossible.
Annular elastolytic giant cell granuloma is mostly found in middle aged women in skin areas exposed to sunlight.
Our 17-year-old female patient had a widespread reddish-brown lesion on the abdomen that met the histological criteria for annular elastolytic giant cell granuloma.
However, the clinical findings and the localization were uncommon.
UV light was excluded as a trigger.
Other, still unknown, factors that might change antigenicity of elastic fibres must be considered.
Spontaneous resolution suggests a transient influence of such factors.
Differential diagnosis includes skin disorders with elastolysis; discrimination especially from mid-dermal elastolysis is not well defined.
Traumatic instability of the sternoclavicular joint is a rare diagnosis.
It is usually treated by different bandaging techniques without the possibility of early functional aftercare.
In the period betweeen 1 January 1996 and 31 December 1998, a total of eight patients with unstable sternoclavicular joints requiring surgical treatment were treated with Balser plates.
The population comprised sevenanterior and one posterior dislocations.
A 81-year-old man presented with massive hemoptysis and dyspnea.
Results of chest radiography and computer tomography were highly suspicious for a large right-sided tumor of the bronchus with impression of the right main bronchus.
Because of clinical worsening the patient was transferred to our department of pulmonology.
The patient died of unappeasable hemoptysis the next day.
At autopsy we found a 2-cm-diameter tumor of the proximal trachea as the source of massive bleeding and blood aspiration.
Histological examination confirmed the tumor to be an epithelioid angiosarcoma of the trachea, which was a primary as no other tumor manifestation was detected.
The entity of epithelioid angiosarcoma as a primary tumor of the trachea, to our knowledge, has not yet been reported.
The benefits of epidural analgesia are well known, but it is not well understood which types of urologic surgery benefit most from epidural analgesia.
In this study, the effects and side effects of prolonged epidural analgesia are prospectively examined and analysed on 172 adult patients in three different operation groups.
An epidural infusion of local anaesthetic combined with an opioid and adrenaline was given for a period of 5-7 days.
There was no difference between the groups with respect to the effectiveness of the analgesia and patients' perception of the treatment.
Mobilization differed, as expected, between the groups, however even after the most major surgery (e. g. cystectomy with bladder substitution), mobilization was impressively unproblematic.
Retarded return of regular intestinal function after the transperitoneal operation and partly after lumbotomy compared with the extraperitoneal operation depended on which operation was performed and the amount of analgesia given.
The side effects such as sedation, nausea and pruritis were conditional partly on the opiate and partly on the intervention.
Up to 11 % showed slight muscular weakness of the lower limbs as a specific side effect of the local anaesthetic.
Complications: One patient died of cerebral hypoxy due to an initially undetected subdural catheter placement complicated by severe pre-existent carotid stenosis.
In four patients, the epidural analgesia had to be stopped because of catheter migration.
There was no clinical evidence of hematoma, abscess or permanent neurological damage.
Epidural analgesia works well in terms of analgesia, mobilization and patient satisfaction, bearing in mind the potential side effects and complications.
It can be recommended for lumbotomy and long transperitoneal operations however not for extraperitoneal interventions in the lower abdomen such as radical prostatectomy.
High-resolution computed tomography (HRCT) provides excellent contrast between osseous structures, air and soft tissue in conjunction with high spatial resolution.
Therefore, thin-section HRCT with bone window setting is the method of choice for the examination of the middle ear structures.
The indications are acute and chronic inflammatory changes, cholesteatoma and tumor, the "postoperative middle ear", and malformations.
In most cases, HRCT enables differentiation between inflammatory changes, cholesteatoma, and tumor.
The excellent depiction of subtle osseous details enables the identification of erosions of the ossicles or of the bony walls of the mastoid cells, of osseous defects of the tegmen, of the bony labyrinth, and of the tympanic course of the facial canal.
In addition, HRCT enables excellent depiction of reconstructions of the ossicles or prosthesis of the ossicles.
Although HRCT is the first method of choice, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) may provide additional information and lead to a more accurate diagnosis in some cases.
This is explained by the excellent soft tissue contrast provided by MRI.
In addition, MRI offers the possibility of using various pulse sequences and the administration of IV contrast material.
Therefore, MRI may allow the differentiation between inflammatory changes, cholesteatoma, and tumor in those cases in which accurate diagnosis cannot be made by HRCT.
The differentiation between a meningocele or meningoencephalocele and other entities such as tumors or cholesteatoma can be established by MRI.
Furthermore, MRI can accurately depict cases of labyrinthitis or of neuritis of the facial nerve or of intracranial disease caused by middle ear processes, while this is not always possible by HRCT.
Morbidity and mortality after emergency procedures in 105 patients with perforated colonic diverticulitis were evaluated in a retrospective study.
In different stages of diverticulitis (Hinchey classification: I, 8.6 %; II, 14.3 %; III, 57.1 %; IV, 20.0 %) mortality was 12.4 %.
Preoperative sepsis syndrome with leucopenia and disturbed liver function, cardiac risk factors and obesity were independent prognostic factors in multiple logistic regression.
Accompanied by immunosuppression the mortality rate remarkably increased to 33 %.
The stage of peritonitis showed no influence on the prognosis.
In multivariate analysis, surgical procedure (primary resection 12.4 %, Hartmann's procedure 61.9 %, non-resection procedures 25.7 %) showed influence only on increased general complications.
The role of laparoscopic cholecystectomy on patients with histologically confirmed acute cholecystitis is still controversial.
From January 1992 to December 1996, 228 cholecystectomies were performed for acute cholecystitis and a total of 104 patients were operated on conventionally and 124 patients underwent laparoscopic surgery.
In a prospective study we compared the conventional with the laparoscopic technique.
The results indicated that in 19 patients (15.3 %) treated initially with the laparoscopic technique, a switch to laparotomy was required.
The operating duration was lower for conventional cholecystectomy (75 min versus 95 min).
However, surgical and nonsurgical complication rates were similar in both groups.
The period of hospitalization was shorter in laparoscopic operations.
According to these results we believe that laparoscopic cholecystectomy in patients with acute cholecystitis is a safe and effective procedure.
The patients will benefit from the advantages of laparoscopic surgery without increased morbidity.
The sentinel lymph node dissection (SLND) is one of the most striking developments in the treatment of melanoma.
Since the first report by Morton et al.
in 1992, the method has been refined, and its use has increased.
Introduced as an alternative to elective lymph node dissection (ELND), it has rapidly made its way into clinical practice.
SLND allows precise pathologic staging through removal and analysis of a limited number of nodes (false-negative rate < 2 %).
It distinguishes patients with clinically occult nodal disease from those with tumor-free regional basin who would not benefit from radical dissection.
However, the SLND is still an experimental procedure with yet unproven utility.
Although children are injured everyday through accidents, road traffic, leisure or sports activities, internal lesions of the knee joint due to the trauma are rare.
Diagnose and therapy follow rather empirical than analytical patterns.
A retrospective, controlled study evaluates and recommends ways of treatment.
Traumatic internal lesions of the knee where analysed in 76 children up to age 16.
The pattern of injury changed with increasing age, the trauma remaining the same.
Most common where injuries to the anterior cruciate ligament (ACL).
Main cause where sports activities.
Operative treatment seems to be the appropriate treatment.
Osseous avulsions of the cruciates and collateral ligaments showed good results after transosseous refixation with a suture.
Suturing of intraligamentous ACL-ruptures as well as patellar ligaments plasty showed unsatisfactory results.
Secondary lesions due to instability of the knee where also observed in children.
